I have a tree nut allergy.
my girlfriend loves meat, but she's a vegetarian. her reasoning is that she couldn't bring herself to kill the animal herself so she won't eat it. she does fish though, so she has no problem eating fish. so i guess she's more specifically a pescetarian (they make up words for themselves, i don't even know)  tl;dr - i have a girlfriend
...thought that thing had [horns](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KPZ7B_cB6LU).
I've loved the Surly LHT so far. I mostly use it as a platform for riding my daughter around in a Rhode Gear seat, I can tell you that it's bitchin for that.   I've done a few 50+ mi days on it, not too many yet, but it has surpassed my expectations in every way so far.
Good point, though I do see myself as British: I think I've described myself as European.... once in 26 years?
Very lovely!
Some people don't get word play apparently
I agree with you on this point. There were other parts of the documentary that I disagreed with as well -- such as Nurse's obsession with certainty and consensus in science, but I thought it gave a fairly decent defense of realism of scientific theories.
Daddy #1 is an older dad and she was the youngest of four children. She hardly talked about him.  Daddy #2 is an authoritative, stubborn dad who never showed love to her. Contact between them ended more than 20 years ago. She slept with uncountable man since. And still wonders if she should become reconciled with her dad.
What do you think of Destiny
Yeah, I admit I had a pretty smug grin on my face when I hung up.  I really could not believe she made that call.  I felt bad later on though, she really had a mental illness.  You cannot force someone to get help....
Wait what, the mandate is a republican idea? I dont know what world you live in but im pretty sure thats the main talking point the republicans use against the healthcare bill. You might as well say it was the democrats idea for cutting the taxes of the rich.
It is honestly open up to any style that feels they can compete in a 20 minute set.  Also, remember that the winner is decided via the audience, so the more of your friends you can convince to show up to the event, the more likely you will win.  The first place prize will at least be a $100 gift card to Sam Ash Music.  There will also most likely be consolation prizes as well.
oed.com
I have. :(
Facepalm is hardly a Reddit-only term.
-10 points for not making any attempt to answer the question  +1 upgoat for anarchy \m/
This appears to be a problem with your family. One of the strongest admonitions JWs receive is to take of family responsibilities. In fact if you can run your house well you can't take on responsibilities in the congregation. 
INDIA PALACE!  EDIT: i also love lindo michoacan, and they have a vegetarian menu.
so sorry for your loss man.. thank you for sharing your story with us. Im about to get blazed and make dinner with my wife- I will definitely toke and cook for your bro tonight 
It looks like you shat all over your keyboard...but hey..
This is brilliant, thanks. We have a few decent wine merchants in Belfast who sell import beer. I might have to go with a list.
This is tough for some people.
I read the same article in my women's health class years ago.  And I also felt the same rage at the fact that so many in the recognized feminist world sit around philosophizing in barely reachable jargon about distant aspects of feminism, but do little or nothing to take actual action regarding the issues happening in real women's lives.
[If You Want to Sing Out, Sing Out, by Cat Stevens](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NDq36YD1ESM)
Prove it.  If you can't prove that you're going to disbelieve him, I'm just going to assume you're a believer.  This is a parody.  I think it's just fine for people to make off-handed statements without backing them up on the internet, unless they're trying to sell you something.  And he wasn't trying to sell you anything, so either believe it, ignore it, or look it up yourself.
banging your ex wife
I thought I could start relationships while in old ones all through my teens and early 20s, and it caught up to me big time.  I left my ex-husband for the "man of my dreams"-- he turned out to be a compulsive liar, I suspect that he's a sociopath, he doesn't pay child support for our son, and, well I learned my lesson!  I really hurt my ex and "got mine" over time for sure.  We were only 21 when we got divorced (military) and he has since forgiven me, luckily, not many people like me get that kind of closure.  Lesson learned.  Never again!
I think a lot of people don't realise how important the distinction between "religion" and "ethnicity/culture" is when it comes to a survey like this, due to how the data could be used in future.  They're used to just ticking "CofE" or similar, even if they haven't been to church for decades, without realising that it's ammo for the religious lobby.
[Look here.](https://spreadsheets.google.com/lv?key=tkphIZzRGtFalF8XKtWrMgw&amp;type=view&amp;gid=0&amp;f=false&amp;colid0=2&amp;filterstr0=XBox%20360&amp;sortcolid=-1&amp;sortasc=true&amp;rowsperpage=250)
[My bible](http://i54.tinypic.com/11r3w1y.jpg)
Never underestimate the importance of an accessible 24hr corner store. The day you need looroll at 2am is the day you will realize the truth of what I am saying.
Well I'm not entirely sure if it's over yet, but it seems like that. I'm going to talk to her at school, and see if it will work out. I don't want to completely give up yet
the mess I made; you're cleaning it.
It's a community.  It's not for anything.  Millions of people's thoughts on a million topics.  There has never been anything like this before.
They recognize it happens to both. It's just that one side has a much greater occurrence of it that's blindingly obvious in our daily lives, and the way you deny it is probably fueling their rage/downvotes.
As you get to higher levels as a priest your bubble actually heals when you cast it.  When you get to even higher levels any thing that heals also heals over time.  It's more efficient to wait to cast a bubble till after the tank has taken a bit of damage.  Casting renew as or just before the tank pulls is an easy way to draw aggro from nearby mobs before the tank has a chance to grab them.
Oh, we're certainly *used* to it.
Time to celebrate! I made some [t-shirts](http://www.cafepress.com/belgian_crisis) for the occasion :)
Another fun game, but one I also own, and have played through much too recently.  I imagine once I finally get *"those spurs that jingle jangle jingle"* out of my head I'll give it another run through.
Nah, I've never been confronted. My mother's side knows I'm an atheist, they don't seem to care. I won't tell my fathers side because it just need not be said. My friends all know, they're fine with it too. If anything, I'm the one that brings the topic of it up when certain friends run into certain "moral" troubles that I can see religion steering them into the wrong direction. I encourage rational thinking over the indoctrination they've had to endure as a child. Sometimes it works, sometimes it doesn't, but I've never gotten any flack from my disbelief. As for strangers, it's never had to be brought up before. Never once have I gotten into an argument or anything over religion, and not once have I had to defend an innocent person from any kind of religious abuse either, for that matter. The stories I read hear truly amaze me. I would have no idea that people discriminate against us if it weren't for reddit.
At any time, have you ever thought of going to couples counseling? 
Talk to your HR guy if you think there's going to be an issue talking directly to this guy. 
Don't get me wrong, I love him for what he did for us.  But as long as he releases statements such as "Crouch has been fantastic this season, I wouldn't consider selling him,"  and thinking that we're just a Scott Parker and Phil Neville away from being title contenders, I will maintain that he is not the right man for the job.
No squinting required. As I said, most data contains some kinds of relationships, except for pure textual data like that found on web pages, books, etc.  I have no statistics on how often people misuse a technology. I only know that pragmatically there are few (if any) products that use pure key-value stores as a back-end, despite what you read.  Our initial discussion actually surrounded whether a column-oriented database was the same as a key-value store, which you said it was. They clearly are not by the definition that the columns represent cross-row relationships. But of course since you feel that formal definitions have no real place in a comp. sci. discussion, you're free to call a red-black tree a banana and get back to your life.
Well the orphans are shit so it might be an issue transporting 
The problem with the Big Society idea is that it is a destination, not a plan. I like a lot of what it's supposed to be, put I don't think anyone, including Cameron, has a good idea of how to get there.
I agree. 5 months of police work for only 11k worth of transactions? Ive seen small operations such as this that go through more than 11k in three weeks. 
Step 1:  Make strawman argument.  Step 2:  Insist that someone else who is not making that argument sift through all your comments to find some random anonymous poster who you insist is actually making that argument in order to show that you are not actually making a strawman argument.  Step 3:  ?????  Step 4:  Profit!
Terrible attempt at a penis joke. 
I agree with you, so I upvoted, although I don't think corporations are evil.
I think he likes it because he likes it.
so...success!
How do you stream to the iPad?
On the basis of adequate lighting, I'll allow it.  But I'm still watching you ಠ_ಠ 
&gt;It's  FTFY
I need to find videos of Drogba and submit it there.
Me and the wife both like this one... fun times to be had for both of us. http://www.shopwiki.com/Double+Penetrator+Cock+Ring
How good is your memory?
Very good point. I feel pretty stupid for not having thought of that. 
Haha, I'm a dude, I was joking. What I really meant was, don't open a conversation with sex on your mind. Just relax and think about something else. I know too many dudes like that
Touche. I suppose I don't really think about these kind of things.
it's okay. I suppose to say that sales would go down the shitter is a bit extreme, but as it says in the article  &gt; "... a lot is being expected from the Verizon iPhone which could alter the landscape dramatically"  it's still fair to say that this change could drastically affect the sales of android powered devices. I know many people that want an iPhone but didn't want AT&amp;T, who are planning on switching to Verizion as soon as they can because they're more comfortable with that network. 
There's no statue of limitations on something so heinous, I would imagine.
he still mad.
*eyeroll* This is about trying to schedule K2.  I've had a better high smoking oregano.  What a pathetic step backwards =\
Damn, well thanks for the info. Getting into engineering is pretty crucial for me so hopefully it all works out.
DUUUUDE you're getting a Dell, but sorry dude no drivers. [](/troll)
I hope you're right!  Good luck with your writing.
If it ever comes out on blu-ray, it sounds like it would only be available in 4:3. I've never seen an official announcement regarding blu-ray or 16:9, but everything I've been able to find online (mostly message board comments and transcribed interviews) makes it sound like they have no desire to release it in an aspect ratio different than 4:3, and possibly no media other than DVD. Hopefully that changes though, I wouldn't hesitate to upgrade, even if it was only 4:3 on blu-ray.  Update: See the comments below. Looks like it is cropped. http://imgur.com/a/BTc37
I don't think they were named after that movie (if they were I had no idea). Also, we kept it going after you left. I added pink and rainbow.... though those didn't last very long. My suggestion of FUCHSIA and MAGENTA didn't go over well because no one could spell apparently. There was also GREEN, RED, BLACK, and GREY.
Fair enough.
You have that backwards- hot goes to the small prong, neutral goes to the wide one. This is so that on ungrounded plugs, you can't accidentally orient the plug so that neutral gets connected to the live wire.
Effectively you're arguing not against metered bandwidth then, but rather the price.  You probably do pay a flat service charge on top of your per-gallon usage btw, though It's likely very small.
while i do agree with you about the lifter providing the extension anyway, you need all the help you can get while lifting heavy. and if squeezing my elbows together and pointing downwards helps me lift 50lbs more, i'll be a fool not to use it.  i'm actually not too familiar with low bar lifting since all i do is high bar, and you want to force the chest up and stay upright. from what i'm familiar with powerlifters like dave tate and louie simmons, they all advocate the elbows under position though.  &gt; If the individual had so much weight as to collapse his entire trunk, then a re-evaluation of his strength level and form would be in order.  within reason yes. if he isn't using all his tools to generate enough tension then a re-evaluation of form is necessary. improve your form to generate maximal tension and you won't be collapsing
skeptical bear?
Yes, a lot. I question things about the world, my perception, and reasons for doing things, all the time.
I was waiting for you. 
Great remix* by mt eden
I'm going to miss the music so much. One of the things I absolutely love about MvC2.
And that direct rate per GB has to reflect the actual costs to transfer a GB of data across the network. Which doesn't even come close to $1/GB. I don't think it even comes close to $0.10/GB
My grandfather was a registered Girl Scout when my mom was in it all the way through my twelve years and he was always welcome, but my family members were the troop leaders. Some Girl Scout mom's out there can be pretty snobby though, and it's not pretty. It really just depends on the troop, and your community.
Don't get me wrong, I love T&amp;M, especially in the summertime when they open the place up. :) It's just not the first place I go if I want to try new beers. That deck was our usual lunch spot back when it was still MacGregors.
We have had a conservative minority government for a while shitting on our country.
&gt; express as little judgement/specific expectations as possible  This is just generally very good life advice
Um. You might not know with open source either. 
preemptive fucking is always fun.
That's why I clean my ears *during sex*. There is no greater sensation.
It was released, it just wasn't what we expected. Turns out the "documents" were a script and "US Bank" was referring to Carlton Banks.  Belated spinoff sit-com and it was horrible. You didn't miss anything.
Most retarded movie ever. What happens when u have to pee? You can't live off poop btw, it's waste!! I dunno, the movie was just a shock and awe attempt that failed imo. 
No grape drank?
"hey homeless guy, you can just remake yourself if you find a wife and get her pregnant so this fight is balanced!"
Without giving exact figures, what would someone in your position make in salary-terms, as well as what would the median gamer make. Made 5 figures? Low 6 figures? Thanks!
she was playing sc with her boyfriend in the vid. that bastard.
Do you really think any democrat in todays America will push an actual lefty agenda? The world is a far more complex place than will allow just "closing up shop" and acting like nothing happened.
Every time I see an interview with the guy, it is **so** uncomfortable. I'm in shock they get him to say his lines ok in his movies. 
Try being a pvp survival server mod "Some guy is griefing my house! Ban him!" 
is that australian? they use it here too.
The worst was Plan 9 From Outer Space, or possibly Attack of the 20 Foot Woman(might have been 50 foot, don't remember), but those were at least enjoyable since they were so bad you could laugh at them.  The hands down least enjoyable film i've seen:  He's Just Not That Into You.  Worst movie ever.
I'd actually take 5FDP over Disturbed. I mean, Disturbed isn't as bad as them, but they have terrible live shows.
Funny People. I walked out in that movie, I don't want to see an emotionally broken adam sandler, it's just too pathetic. 
A Z22 round is about 30ftlb from what I've read so that is less than half the power.  Thanks for the info.  Was this .22 or .177?  How often did you find that you had to finish the bird by hand afterwards?
This isn't world news... more like LGBT news.
I do not care for your drop-shadow. I do not care for it at all, sir.
what about a rotary evaporator and cold finger condenser?
[I'll just leave this here](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LKegK2fbzr8)
are supplies limited? should I act now?!?
We need a price range.
It was that, or skin my chauffeurs...
Speaking as a former library employee... About half of the patrons were watching porn.  &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Make yourself a budget.  During the daytime, drive around and see how many people aren't at work (not a good sign).  If you can afford it, rent a house / Duplex.  They might be less professional or maintenance free but not sharing walls with neighbors is almost priceless.
I take umbrage to the use of the term "pirate" to describe someone who does the equivalent of taking pictures of art someone is trying to sell. Compare that to the traditional and history meaning which was to attack a ship, rob them and possibly kill them.
I have a similar problem. But I know what it is. I just get distracted. :/ I can get it up when it starts. But then I am constantly thinking about all other kinds of bullshit and I'm lost on some tangent by the time we get her clothes off. Fuck even receiving head I'm off thinking about trees or some bullshit and my danger dips and she's like "wtf 450, why your danger not dinging?" And I'm like "Alright so, like have you ever considered trees?" And she's like "OMG RAGEQUIT."
I was expecting a Christiano Ronaldo fansite.
People started carrying knives and guns. And running in packs.
pho..heavy on the sriracha to loosen that mucus!
I am always surprised when people make the sort of statement you made.  I wonder how you compare yourself to the rest of the world, and what value you bring in your daily humdrum existence to the world at large.   You have to have a certain mindset and confidence to do the job he does. He also has to spell things out clearly for the less mentally fortunate, and the Gates reference was not a comparison per se, but a simile for clarity, something everyone can understand.  Who does he owe it to to be humble? Does he owe you? He certainly does not owe me. He has a job that neither you or I or very many of his detractors could do.   Am I an Assange groupie?, I don't think so. I evaluate all data based at face value, and I can see the value of his enterprise. I have not seen any hypocrisy in his actions when all his statements are taken into consideration - i.e not single snippets of conversations taken out of whole context. He keeps Government honest. There is nothing wrong with that. That is a good thing. One day you may value that also.
I have some things to finish up, but if I'm done I'll try to hop on.  *Edit: Nope, maybe some other time.*
PROTIP: Dont leave anything in your car.  Anything.  Even for a second.  Under the Viaduct is the worst, take a quick walk avoiding the car glass and you'll see why.
Separate but equal.
Diamond isn't too hard to get, and a diamond shovel will last god-near forever. The trick is wood. A 64 of wood, and two or three stone pickaxes will get you down to bedrock with enough ladders to get out again. Once you get down to bedrock, just mine 1x2 tunnels for a bit until you find a diamond or three, and climb out. 10-15 min tops.   If you're really stingy, take a 64 of dirt down with you and back-fill the hole to get out. I find that strategy is a bit of a waste considering all the effort, but hey, it's YOUR stupid block game, not mine. 
Hope you can fap with lefty. Get well soon.
Fundamentalists are trying to rewrite history and ruin science and politics simply because it does not fit in with their extreme opinions and beliefs. 
http://meetup.com is a great place to start.
Oh well there goes the eating them with good conscience feeling :(
&gt; Ron Paul's position on abortion is considerably more disconcerting than just believing that it should be illegal. Read about the Sanctify of Life Act. He believes that the FEDERAL GOVERNMENT should DEFINE life as beginning at conception THROUGH AN ACT OF CONGRESS.  As a person who does not agree that life (personhood more correctly) begins at conception, I do not think that a person that does is at all inconsistent by demanding that it be recognized at the federal level. I would argue that it's a moral imperative to do so.  When a person is a person is so fundamental to any reading of the constitution that if anything is a federal issue I'd be hard pressed to come up with one more critical that this.
I was just joking :)
49?
[](/harpdarp)
Obama won't do a god damn thing. Anything that makes sense, he just doesn't do. Not one dumb fucktard in washington has any sort of common sense
It'll be all of, like, 6 feet tall. I'm a bad person.
Nothing like a balanced argument.
Let the bodies hit the floor...
HAHA... It was I who caught the mistakes last time too. At least I am the only one who knows you are struggling..
What?  That trailer confused me deeply.
Yes the neurons in V1 fire more rapidly, but this propagates through to many of the other areas.  &gt;The short answer is feedback from "higher visual areas."  So when I make a decision to direct my attention to something in my peripheral vision, the higher visual areas tell V1 to fire rapidly? It doesn't first come from the prefrontal cortex?  I was also curious as to the specific method of increasing neuron activity?
American Apparel is an international brand, the shirts are of better fit and quality than your typical Made in China t-shirt and they're probably a better value for someone budget conscious just trying to build up their simple wardrobe.   They're cut skinny and long, perfect for you. I would not feel comfortable recommending to spend $50 on a "fine white t-shirt". Check their website and ebay (eBay is good for ultra-cheap wholesale deals).  Also there is probably an AA store in Australia.
Anyone can fly it. You have to be a starship captain not to crash.
oh my gosh yes.   I built my gaming computer for about 700 dollars including the two monitors compared to the 2000 it would of cost me with an upscale brand.   and plus, all my guy friends think im awesome.
As much as i would love a fallout MMO, i really think the game functions better as just an RPG, though co-op would be great.
Ya, but I also own a dell mini 9,Going on it's third SSD.Have a 1st gen MBP No problems at all in 5 years! G4 Imac from 8 years ago No problems.Use Dells at work,all of them have had major problems in the last 4 years! Run XP on my MBP, really works well.Sorry!
The engine on that accord (K24a8) i-Vtec engages at around 3000RPM.   I would take it in ajd660.
Hmmm, yeah I'm not sure of one off the top of my head that covers both. I may take just a straight theory book and develop bass exercises myself based off that book. I haven't really been one for books, though. Mostly because I guess I just haven't found one yet that works for me.
How did you get into the job? Im studying psychology and want to do  a masters/Ph.D in Clinical Psych and need to get some (alot) of relivent work experence. 
Wow, how could you fuck that up?
Don't forget the *alma mater*. That's tied into your phone as well.
I would have gladly paid double or even tripe for my degree. 
If you're willing to pay 800 MS points for it, I have a LEGO Rock Band code.  I haven't tested the AC/DC code because I have no idea if testing to see if it's been used will use it up.
Cooking meat thoroughly kills things like E. Coli.   
The best is when you plug in a service tag for an old model like a Gx260 or something and get drivers for 10 different network cards. Really guys, did you really put that many different parts in the same models of computers? Am I really supposed to open this up and look on the chip itself to figure out the magic number??? I hate Dell.
This was over the weekend 
This will probably not help but I lay this on the couch like this:    o_/_/\   with a throw pillow in my now elevated lap. I have a netbook so it doesn't require a lot of pressure to keep it from sliding. Your mileage may vary. I have several follow up questions though.   * Why was a friend on the work chair to begin with? I bet they were not working! * How did it break? Those chairs look pretty sturdy.  * What kind of freelance writing do you do? Technical? * Why does your ass hurt? What position and where are you sitting now? * Have you considered cushions or pillows? * Are you planning on buying a new chair or are you looking for a temporary replacement? * You mention in your post that you are either working or masturbating, am I to understand that you are masturbating for eight hours a day, mostly while sleeping?  * You say you are a freelance writer. Have you considered writing titles for reddit submissions? I think you have a knack for it.
Gentlemen, please be reasonable. There is no need for bloodshed. I move that the beverage in question be referred to as soda-pop from now on.
Please describe how this would come about.
Thanks for the info. I didn't update my ps3 yet and was just gonna wait till the whole thing's fix
Fellow coworker to teefish and the soda knocking asshole here, and this guy who knocked over the can really is an unapologetic annoying fartknocker. He probably thought it was funny as fuck. Not to mention this fartbox tongue-puncher thinks it's funny that he gets no work for being incompetent and getting nothing done while the rest of us have full loads.
Before electronic banking, there existed very high numbered notes that were used mostly for sending money from bank to bank. 500, 1000, etc.
You need to hear more about them before you make this judgement. That is more of a Rush Limbaugh accounting of them. I have heard they are not radicals. Get more info before you "RUSH" to judgement.
sign 1  global warming 0
Seriously dude... at the rate you're going, a diamond ring will be cheaper
Rats.  I'm an experienced forensics judge and I'd love to help you out but I just can't do it this weekend, sorry. 
Yeah, it's my favorite Pale Ale. I'm sure there are better Pale Ales out there, but I've only been drinking Pale Ale for a few years. And no one ever schooled me to this shit. Most of my friends drink piss beer (such as Busch). 
169 bar at 169 East Broadway.  You can get 40s of Colt 45 in a bucket like the kind they put wine in to keep it cool, and a can of colt 45 with a shot of well liquor is $5.  They also have a gogo dancer, steel tipped darts, pool, and serve raw oysters and dumplings, yes DUMPLINGS.  It's a pretty weird place, but it is cheap as hell and a good time with friends
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6LPTP9WsD8k
Please give another link, if you have.  Hulu sucks balls, as anyone outside of the US cannot get it, or at least, most cannot.
oh my god. WOW. if that was me.. idk, i probably would have just died on the spot. I would have viewed that skewed arm, and just fell over dead.   ouch, ouch, ouch. thats going to hurt when it rains
Again, the entire plan is based around the mandate.  The stuff that you claim is working so well right now just increases costs, and will destroy the entire insurance system without the mandate to balance those new benefits out.
He's dead :( downvote :(
There is a big difference between the governments of Saudi Arabia and Iran.
&gt;Comparing a right to speak your mind and a right to carry a gun seems a little disingenuous; one is much, much more important than the other.  While both Amendments exist, neither Amendment can be taken away. You can't have one without the other. I'd say they are equally as important.  Aside: Driver's licenses are not law. They are statute. You do not need a drivers license to drive on the roads, but you have to be very specific how you do it. (It's a pain-in-the-ass, essentially...)
While he had some good movies here and there I believe he will make a much better producer than director. 
I like my bees the way I like my coffee: covered in women.
Aren't we all?
&gt; Dubstep originated in impoverished London...  Skrillex is what blink-182 was to punk. Sure there was some roots, but they missed the whole fucking gist of the thing.
[](/whoa "That's a big gusta.") 
&gt; The welfare of all people is more important than the possible (or actual) misbehaviour of a few criminals, crazies, or idiots.  FTFY
It should be better known that the responsible justices who recuse themselves from conflicts of interest (like Sotomayor) are Democratic nominations, and the clown brigade of narrow ideologues who take dirty money (Scalia, Thomas) were Republican nominations. Anybody remember Harriet Miers?  
And [here](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6xiy9OBw0CM) is my main frustration with CoD.  Then again I have not played it since I bought Bad Company 2.
you mean "mixers"
Nice try, Taco bell.
Thought it was some guy sitting on a throne at first... looked at the title again... Looked back -  Whoa, it jumped right out at me.  Sweet.
Also, good video with it too.
If you get the red, white or navy one you can get the 18-55mm in a matching color. There is 12 colors available in the US and Europe (100 and [**1**](http://winarco.com/pentax-announched-pentax-k-x-robotic-colors-limited-edition-digital-camera/) available in Japan).   Also [in Japan, the K-r has a special site](http://www.camera-pentax.jp/k-r/simulator.php) so you can design your own choosing from 12 body colors, 10 grip colors, and 12 (35mm) lens colors so 1,440 color combinations and then [tweet it to the world](http://www.camera-pentax.jp/k-r/meeting/).  
I'd be happy, because it would actually make a lot of people sit up and think about if they are actually religious or not, and what this vote means.
[In related news...](http://i.imgur.com/PacnG.png)
I have read many articles from people who can not do vegan. It is not because they don't want to but because their body can not do it. http://thelazyveganblog.blogspot.com/2007/06/what-if-everyone-cant-be-vegan.html  http://www.vegan123.com/raw-food/what-is-healthier-a-raw-food-diet-or-a-vegan-diet-what-is-tastier-raw-food-or-vegan
Congrats! Put all that income into a nest egg and watch it grow! 
Did you smell it first?
So... this means you would consent to it, right?  Maybe you should try to imagine a situation where you would NOT want to have sex with the person.  Like, your dad.  For most people there is a boundary beyond which forced sex is not cool. 
They don't let me kill things in real life.
No problem. My point was that the comic had the context you're talking about. The t-shirt didn't.  If a comedian had a complicated, contextualized joke about a fictional misogynist character that had a catch-phrase "I hate womens." and the whole set-up was funny because it pointed out how out-of-touch the character was, people would still have a problem if they came out with a line of coffee mugs that simply said "I hate womens."
There is something you can do that will help other Dell owners. Make an ISO of your driver disk, make a torrent of it, and upload the torrent to The Pirate Bay. That's the first place many users look when they need drivers.
Do you guys have Dinner or Supper?
Its been said that usually great insights are achieved through great trauma.  Its really hard work to make a big change, the more work you are willing to put in the more you make it happen.
I work in Australia for an American-owned company, and recently we were reviewing the guidance on what is considered to be products manufactured by America. I was totally stunned to find out that the products we make in Australia and consumed *by* Australians are considered to be America-manufactured products.
Spoken like a true redditor.
World Net Daily. The smartest, most hard hitting conservative journalism there is.
heard
I really like your name.
Reuben sandwich is BEST sandwich.  /truth
It's like getting used to wine. Once you start trying it, you'll appreciate the differences. 
[RvB](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9HZnIoFAGps#t=2m)
interesting....very interesting
UNDER PRESSURE  w..wait..shit.
Only way to do it right!
I think what the guide is missing is the part where it explains why anyone should give a fuck if their opinions or ideas offend Egyptians, Arabs and the world.
im saying your comparison was completely off. You told someone to do something, therefore it is in some way your responsibility.
I've been making double-decker trees for my epic forest.  You can chop out the top center leaves (directly on top of the trunk), drop a block of dirt, and then plant another sapling.  After it grows, if the dirt bugs you, you can hack it out and put a wood block in its place.  I have a spot where a few giant trees grew, and I double-decker'd them, and the new saplings went giant.  I named it the "Grove of the Ancients."
&gt;What? Why are you trying to convince me that your opinion is correct.   At first I honestly was thinking you were saying "Be careful how you get the information to the man, it can mess up your marriage" So I was trying to get you to clarify for the OP.  The last post was me realizing "naw, she's okay saddling the guy with kids he doesn't want rather than having an adult conversation with his wife", I'm trying to convince the OP your advise is morally inconsistent with a bunch of cases he knows how to react to properly as a descent human being.   Your story implies getting the information to the man that his marriage will be doomed by this. That's a crap thing to say. His marriage is only doomed by this if his wife is too cowardly to tell the man, and call the woman out for burdening her with her nasty plan and reacts with distrust rather than gratitude that her husband is a moral, upstanding man with some courage in his blood.
You listen to Ke$ha! hehe
Elope to corroborate?
Those eye-circles are doing a really swell job at hiding your identity...
Yes. yes it is. So?
Why don't you make Cannabutter and put it into protein treats.
The original tele bass humbucker is what I'm going after. http://www.vintageguitars.org.uk/graphics/72TeleBassHumbucker.jpg  Unfortunately, nobody makes a replacement and the originals go for way too much on ebay.  I like the idea of a rail, but I think I'll start with a P92, then if I don't like it I can use it in future project guitar and put a Fralin split blade in.
Question: Will I be investigated somehow for calling Sens. Franken and Hutchinson "sexy foxes" on my Valentine?
sarcasm...not always understood on reddit. esp by the canadians...
She seemed young, like 21 or so.   She could have been new, but didn't seem that way until I got into the room with her. Then she was hyper-sensitive to any movement I made. Almost like she had been attacked before. Mad me feel shitty just to be in the room with her. Like I was a predator, and in a certain way of looking at it, I was totally a predator. A stoned cold Predator. 
I recommend his book [Six Days of War](http://www.amazon.com/Six-Days-War-Making-Modern/dp/0195151747)
[](/megusta "He's a shooter.")
Thanks for the advice. I'm going to try the temp agencies next. 
There isn't a simple answer. I don't think you'll usually have slow performance when you're in game, but as far as opening the game and loading new maps/levels go, a faster hard drive is going to mean less waiting time.
You can still pick up an i7 at [Amazon](http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B004EBUXSU/ref=s9_simh_gw_p23_d2_i4?pf_rd_m=ATVPDKIKX0DER&amp;pf_rd_s=center-2&amp;pf_rd_r=1DKDRFBQ41JY9BTAJBCQ&amp;pf_rd_t=101&amp;pf_rd_p=470938631&amp;pf_rd_i=507846) and an i5 at [Amazon](http://www.amazon.com/Intel-i5-2500K-Processor-Socket-LGA1155/dp/B004EBUXHQ/ref=sr_1_1?s=electronics&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1296517951&amp;sr=1-1) and [MWave](http://www.mwave.com/mwave/SKUSearch_v3.asp?px=FX&amp;scriteria=BA47496).  I think it was smart of Newegg to stop selling them though, and I'm sure it saved them a lot of money.  I'd really hate to see what their RMA rate on mobos and CPUs was before this announcement and what it is now.
Spin engine is definitely an underrated card, and an absolute powerhouse if the enemy doesn't have a good amount of cheap removal, because they will not ever get the chance to kill it in combat, and it will continue to hit them hard, especially if you are able to equip it.  I can't tell you how many of the games I won were due to Spin Engine + equipment (piston sledge and copper carapace mostly).
PR's:  Mile: 4:31 5k: 15:58 10k: 33:46 Half: never done one, lol. Marathon: 2:46  Goals: 5k: 15:30 10k: 33:00 Half: 1:15 Marathon: 2:39
True but PvP was also my worst matchup, once in Silver I was not able to beat another brotoss until I learnt the 4-gate. Sentries only delay the 4-gate push as he has proxy pylon somewhere outside of my base.  
I'm OK with being *that* guy.  If someone asked me what kind of hybrid car to buy I would tell them that if they are looking to save money on fuel a gas model will have a lower total cost of ownership over it's lifetime even when the fuel savings of a hybrid is factored in, and that if they are looking to save the environment they would be better off buying a used car.  I mean, if someone asks me what type of "inferior product" to buy and I know they can find a superior product for the same price, if not less, I will mention it every time. 
&gt; I played the "too busy" card. Oh, Jesus Christ are you her but a guy and from an alternate reality that came to-- I mean, yeah, she pretty much did that to me. I think that's what was going on. I completely empathize with what you said about feeling neglected and stuff, though. That's exactly how I felt. Not being able to just turn off my emotions was rough. Thanks for sharing, sir.
Which location?
You Minnesota hiphop heads are spoiled. I wish the hiphop was a fraction of what rhymesayers are putting out in my state. 
Or cocaine!
I am pretty sure FrankenFran is the Japanese equivalent of house. I put a lot of emphasis on "Japanese" when i say that. 
I was expecting a movie reference or a popular saying. But that's a fairly good remark.
You mean fizzy drinks ಠ_ಠ
I'm leveling a Demonolgy lock right now, I'm at 52. From like 25 up all i do is AOE grind. Gather 5-6 mobs on the mount, then set the felguard on them, hand of gul'dan, then the axe twister thingy. By then he has all aggro and I have time to set some corruption on them. By the time I pull out rain of fire, I have time to channel it maybe twice.
That's actual makes a lot of sense. I guess well have to wait until the year 3,000 for most people to become atheists. In terms of Christianity I think when engough time passes without the return of Christ well see that fall to the wayside.   
It floats up through your clothes [](/troll)
1. Owning a car is an option, not something you are forced to buy. Obamacare is NOT an option. 2. uninsured drivers can cause economic damage to others, but sick people just cause economic damage to themselves
Public trans? You mean a handful of buses? Come now, the light rail is repeatedly voted down. Even though a train used to run from Spokane to CdA. 
don't care if this is a parody, it's stupid and you shouldn't have commented with this shit in the first place
I'm confident that we can't possibly fuck things up that badly by sticking things into other things.  We're not going to suddenly create some kind of mutant super race that takes over the world, or zombie virus, or any sort of doomsday scenario.  We may very well upset the natural ecological balance, but let's be realistic - we do that anyway.   There *may* be some long-term health effects from consuming large amounts of a given transgenic product, but you could say the same about mobile phones, diet supplements, hand moisturiser, toothpaste, or any one of a million things that you do quite happily every day.  Until you can actually demonstrate that harm though, there's no reason to reject a tool that can solve a problem.  Poor GM work will result in a poor product, which will ultimately fail.  Good work will create a good product, which will be of benefit to millions.  I don't think there's a need to bring evil corporate motivations into it specifically, other than to expose wrongdoing where you can, and thus motivate better behaviour.  Either way, that's not a problem which is specific to GM as a technology.
nah
I just type "national mosaic" into my address bar and it goes directly to NOAA's national radar map.   This is the source of almost all US weather data.  It lets you interpret that shit yourself.
The ones that actually read and know the bible more are atheists. Most Christians don't even know what's in their own bible, let alone, read it.
this is unacceptable.  you are going to get quite the tongue lashing.
[](/yuno) Y U USE LE IMPROPERLY? 
did you ever do something and think to yourself, that wasen't very raven
Come on... Nobody gives a shit if people in the military live or die. Thats their job.
What is a good tea? I'm not a tea fan but I wouldn't mind trying something new.
ProTools can quantize mid-waveform?  [Edit: forgot "mid-"]
Possibly an ignorant question but I live in BC and as far as I know this hasn't happened here yet, any idea if/when they plan to roll this out to other provinces? 
Someone was late to the party.
i have to agree i went through the same thing, end result is same.
Because there's no corporate profit in it.
His name was Tyler Poxton.
Just curious, what did your ex do to make you want to do that? Personally, I'd be pretty devastated (if I still cared for her). Did he ever find out?
Why not post this in r/dating_advice? I think it will do better there. 
Thounsands of babies are born EVERY DAY. Why should I give a shit that ONE of them was conceived by a member of the most popular site of the Internet?! This isn't a community anymore, it's wide fucking public. Doesn't make this "birthday present" special AT ALL for us. Gladly downvoted. Stay on Facebook.
Sounds like you want people on Reddit to settle your personal vendetta against this place and the doorman.   1) Assuming you are telling the truth you should give money to charity because you want to help people, or want a tax deduction, not to buy negative reviews from people for a place they have never been to.   2) You shouldn't encourage people to give negative reviews to a place they have never been to. You are asking people to lie about something so you can get your revenge. It could have great food and beer, and maybe not everyone will have such a bad experience as you did.   3) Reddit isn't your personal army.   My advice to you is write to a local newspaper. Go get the word out, but don't try to buy bad reviews for a place by bribing them with the promise of charity.   *EDIT* OP deleted their account? Either a troll or too much negative feedback. 
I've never seen snow and thunder at the same time.
To clarify your two points: It sounds like removing the negative terminal then reattaching is to determine whether it's the battery that is bad. If so, the battery has been checked and was found good. As to pulling fuses, this was my initial plan with the multimeter. With the multimeter attached I know you can pull fuses until the draw drops to reasonable levels. Going forward I'm going to first try muffdyvr's suggesting of checking whether the multimeter is good and follow up by removing the fuse for the factory radio as godzilla geek pointed out it could be a hazard. Removing the fuse should keep any short from starting the car on fire.  Thanks for the input. 
also near gagetzen you can turn in cloth i think but it was for 500 per
awkwaaaard
Yeah seriously, I use all of that time. I am in a cold flat so the first 5 mins of the shower are mostly about returning to room temperature and normal human operating conditions. Feels amazing too and I like to luxuriate in it, it's refreshing and wakes me up. I seem to need to philosophise a little each morning ("what am I doing here?" "what is this all for?") to get me going and the shower also serves as a good place for this part of my routine. As I warm up I segue into the philosophy. I try to parallelize this stuff with the refreshing / waking up part so I'm getting two or three things done at once. The rest is just washing like I guess everyone else does, which takes about 10-15 minutes.
Thank christ!  
Well, it isn't that I don't think that champ fights aren't fun (they are),  but I think the punishment for losing a champ fight is going back to your base to heal, not sitting there still getting XP.  I do agree this will make certain harassment type champs much stronger in the laning phase.
Perhaps it is open source, but it doesn't necessarily mean that _you_ can have the source or even the compiled thing.
1 day out of warranty a reoccurring hardware problem cropped up again. The plastic peeling on my 1 year 1 day old laptop. The plastic had been replaced before and I had other defects fixed during the warranty. That 1 day after warranty expires = dell told me to fuck off if I didn't pay $59 for trouble shooting (Troubleshoot what? THE PLASTIC IS FUCKING PEELING) and considering the price quotes I had before it would have been well over $1k to get it fixed.  Moral of the story - I am never buying a dell for consumer grade shit again. That includes Alienware.   Lenovo4life!
Isn't it typically the other way around?
I'd expect to see at least a substitute appearance.
I'm thinking it's a forgone conclusion as to how Scalia and Thomas will go.  Question is the remaining seven.
Just because something is a genetic mutation doesn't mean it's beneficial.  Just wondering, would you support therapies to help paraplegics walk?
Well it sounds like they should count the number of successful comments.
Really great article, we enjoyed!
You monster.
Too bad the wild west probably [wasn't very wild](http://www.examiner.com/gun-rights-in-minneapolis/dispelling-the-myth-of-the-wild-west) to begin with.
Yup -- for now it's located [here](http://sleepyti.me/backup2).  I'm working on integrating a few features this week/next weekend, so look for changes coming soon :)  Top of the list is: integrating the reverse calculator, 24 hour clock option, allowing time to be changed on-the-fly after calculation and mobile layout for smartphone users.  Thanks for the feedback! :)  edit: looks like one of my changes has effected the backup2 directory. should be working again at some point soon (read: when I get home and fix it), however!
How can you be so sure?
Agreed, blew my mind to read a bio on him after finishing the series. SRSLY WTF?????
I'm sorry soldier, but the war ended before it began. 
Unless you get an abortion and use the fetus as compost.
Nice try, Dell employee
I'm sick of people (this means *you*) being a dick to others who try to share interesting or funny things they find. Post the fucking source and shut up. That's it. No accusations, no assumptions, no nothing. You're being an asshole, and you're helping to ruin reddit. I won't apologize for getting angry.
Shiiiiiiiiiit, I haven't seen that movie in so long...
Taurus!
Or yahoo cache... (just kidding).
first they came for my dsl but i said nothing because i used cable....
Good points. As I mentioned in another response, I had not considered rape or torture forms of imprisonment or loss of control.
Poor Diddums.   I'm sure the 160k per year pension will help him get over it.
The first...tall tee?
&lt;_&lt; thats MY name!
True to my word, here's a picture of a DSLAM cabinet (right) and the jumper wire interface (left).  [Picture](http://i.imgur.com/2IGiD.jpg) complete with graffiti.
Sign up for other sports.  Take a cheap fun community college class like a cooking class.  Volunteering helping people or for a cause you care about.  Get a dog as great friend and then meet people at a local dog park.  Yoga/Pilates classes will help heal your hip and hot chicks in Lulu's will help bring joy to your heart.
"I Touch Myself" the Divinyls
Duct Tape Perfectionist here. 
Y you doctor? Y U NO ACTOR?  *runs*
Wouldn't that be on the underwear?
Ohmygod-ohmygod-ohmygod!  My favourite show and my favourite game together at last.  Colonel Mustard, in the Hospital, with the Cornballer?
I'm mad because someone talked about the ending of a book that came out like four years ago!
depends how the gel. still Utd. for me
Atheism isn't a religious belief, it's the lack of one.  The point is that your religion is less important than the fact whether you want *religion to be able to influence politics* or not.
In Network Connections, right click your adapter, properties, and uninstall TCP/IP v6.  [Screenshot](http://imgur.com/URU8L)
Omg! I loved that movie.. being in my 20's I grew up with dracula being dark and secductive... then this happened and turned vampires into pansies! :(!!!
It looks like you accidentally your link.
&gt;All of the things you listed increase the cost of care.   Medicare advantage cuts don't, really. And the other ones do only within the context that the entire fucking market is a legal racket.   &gt;There was no severability clause in the law   I'll hand that one in, that was very stupid of them. Severability clauses are not always standard though, and law has been decided without need of them.
I've used waist size and visual indicators (e.g. ribs!) to guage my changes over the last 6 months or so, because my weight has stabilised around 65kg.  I keep getting thinner, though - so I know it's muscle replacing fat.  :-)  The other thing is that I found it was a bit of a bell curve - at first I lost it slowly, then once I was fit, I was able to lose it more quickly because I had more muscle to sustain and was able to exercise for longer (on weekends, etc).  Now it's slowed again because I'm running out of fat to lose... :-D  So while your effort may not be visible yet, it's certainly helping you in the long term.  But to really eat into the fat, you want to be doing some sustained cardio - try to ride hardish for at least an hour or two on the weekends.  I generally aim for 5 hours of riding across a weekend, and an hour on weekdays.  But if you're really focused on shedding some fat, it's easiest if you manage intake, as well.  Oh, and eat pasta before you ride; it helps build muscle mass, which in turn burns more calories...  :-)
Imports are subtracted from GDP.  And yes, on the supply side too.  
Taking the location into account....  The problem with only seeing a light, is you never know what you are actually seeing. At night, judging distance/size of an airborne light can be exceptionally difficult (even for those trained for it, ex-Army here). The lack of reaction from the locals should be another sign.  I'll admit, it could have been aliens. Just considering the circumstances, other possibilities seem more likely.
I am a PC gamer, have been since load runner and what not.  It's kinda crazy that just a video card cost more then an entire console.   Great site btw.
I think I downloaded the download manager that will then choke because the ftp is dead.
Reading this made me think of a certain dealer.  Let's call him "Nick".  "Nick" is the dealer who is lonely and wants you to be friends with him.
Yeah, I was thinkin that myself really.  But then what is it? Perhaps old Mrs Sidebottom, the retired school teacher has been watching the comings and goings.  Peeping from behind her net curtains with a rising sense of moral outrage and finally decided to do something about it.   Certainly someone educated or with a professional background would have the wit to photocopy the "fake foreign" circular and leaves blanks for addresses in case the brothel simply moved address two doors down.   But then, I'm almost certain that's a man's handwriting.  So....it's the vicar.  Is there a rectory nearby?  I'd have a punt on it being The Reverend Green, in his drawing room, with a ball point pen. 
Sorry, I don't know what Drove me to it....
I've got pictures and an american flag folded up in a closet if anyone needs confirmation.
If you really want to keep your MT4G, grab a sweet case for it and turn it in to the rugged-gadget you really want.  http://www.otterbox.com/HTC-myTouch-4G-Commuter-Series-Case/HTC4-MTC4G,default,pd.html?dwvar_HTC4-MTC4G_color=20&amp;start=2&amp;q=mytouch  Seems pretty rugged.
Oh crap they are playing on sunday! 
Othet students will do it for free, so not many. 
I still say you're wrong.
I'm sure there's an app for that. 
Well sheeze.......... that would have been nice.  But at least I learned about the workings of plugins. I was actually writing one, when I got the idea to modify TST.  Thanks for the link.
Where is this long we are going to?  I think it's too far away.
It was sort of a snide remark given that production quality has sunk to the bottom of the shitter with real tv, and when there is a good show it's usually cancelled before it takes off. But yeah, that too.
Yes.  Your body is a massive, extremely complex adaptive system.  Going without various kinds of crap for a month will lead to de-adaptation.  As you note, however, this isn't necessarily a bad thing.
Obligatory, because you can't take your [dog to heaven.](http://eternal-earthbound-pets.com/)
Yeah. 
I don't think this is true. Tuna can swim very fast and for long distances, and some (eg bluefin) 'display warm blooded adaptations' [wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tuna).  My understanding was that this means that for them to grow they require a lot of food per unit of tuna mass produced, meaning they are not at all sustainable. Granted, I am trying to remember an article (possibly from the Guardian) posted on here a while ago (and which I cannot find) which was about bluefin tuna, so perhaps this only relates to that particular species.
I suggest a tax on calories. Oh wait.
&gt; Next time won't you sing with me.  FTFY HEATHEN
so much hate, I was merely commenting on the artists work
Pandora's Star by Peter F. Hamilton. - *First book in the Commonwealth Saga. Best sci-fi I've read. Not as groundbreaking as some of the classics but thoroughly enjoyable.*  Name of the Wind by Patrick Rothfuss - *Around these parts often called the best new Fantasy book in a long long time. Bonus - The sequel is coming out in March.*  A Game of Thrones by George R. R. Martin - *Long standing classic, brilliantly written. Immensely satisfying.*  Mistborn by Brandon Sanderson - *What if the dark lord won at the final battle? A novel twist on the standard fantasy trope.*  The Vlad Taltos books by Steven Brust - *Snarky, funny, immensely satisfying books about a human assassin in a world where humans are not the dominant race.*
I have absolutely no clue. Sometimes, artists sign their names on their art, and sometimes its purely anonymous. I'll usually cite the source page when I know though. 
All the characters you've made during the beta are kept through every beta event. They are only removed once the servers are reset at the end of the last event prior to the pre-order's early start period.   I would like to see our character names saved to our accounts so we can pick them back up without someone else snagging them, but whether the Dev's will do the extra work or not is yet to be seen. :/
LMAO &gt;you have been banned from posting to RDDT Gaming.  What a bunch of girls. I get kicked out of your bad kids club for linking a post you said you didnt care about.   &gt;OMGZ LULZ
Not if you called 'em crapweed.
Yes I'm probably like that. So how do I keep them from move on?
I don't think girl's realize that with a 90:1 message response ratio, it's hard to stay motivated enough to spend more than 5 minutes on a witty, funny, smart message.  Honestly, ladies, if there was over a 90% chance your message would never be responded to, how much effort would you put into it?
I wouldn't say that's true exactly. Smith's films pretty well all gross the same amount of money. I think that's solely because his fanbase just keeps coming back. He's not gaining a new audience at this point.
Summed up the argument pretty well.
could we make a hole in its path to dissipate it and how deep would that hole need to be?
The "average" user cap (from my anecdotal experience) in New Zealand is roughly 15gb, with mom-and-pop users on about 2 - 5gb, flatters on 30gb ish. For those 15gb, you're looking at around NZD$60-70 (taking this value in USD makes it seem less, but considering the cost of living it's pretty high). I'm on 60gb, on a cheap ISP, and it costs $90/mo.  Yes, it sucks for canada, but you're certainly not alone, and $5 per 40gb is NOTHING. It's not having that cheeseburger that one day in a month.
Can't see the Coen brothers getting on board with this. Sounds like Tara Reid needs something to talk about.
That's my question! If not, what's the origin of something like that, and why in gods name are people actually communicating in the world like that?
You'd anger no one. NO ONE DAMN IT! :)   Assuming that's you in the pictures (which it may not be?) you can just post it. /r/gonewildplus is really only for self posts though. 
Jack Black, hes that guy at a party who tried to hard to be funny and just fails it. To be fair though, i liked Shallow Hal.
When you whip, I whip, we whip!
Just think....if you were to have one right now, you'd have to go through another day one, day two etc. etc.  Who wants to go through those really rough cravings again? They suck. You're doing great. A WEEK!
You can certainly smoke hops, whether it's a good idea is something else entirely.
Growing up my father told us that lamb tastes the most like human meat.  I have heard other people repeating this in the US so apparently it's an urban myth here that contributes to the lack of interest in the meat.
I've been trying to find this for ages I'd forgotten the name. As, OP, you need to learn to letter by hand. Doing it with a computer without doing your post work in the computer does not look nice.   Check out Understanding Comics by Scott McCloud
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Wizard_(film)  Don't worry, I've never seen it either. It looks awful.
Also Jackie's Fifth Amendment nearby.
"We dislike homosexuals and the obese because we fear that is what we would become if we lost our self-control."  Daniel Pinkwater.
So, wait... you [like Ke$ha](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/fcj6o/what_actorsingercelebrity_is_the_absolute_worst/c1ewunh) and hate Nic Cage, all in the same thread? It is clear to me that you must be destroyed.
Given your username. You like Bad Brains. And if you generally like things like that then Fleet Foxes are probably not up your alley.
Oh I like that. I may grab one. Conventional, yet classy for something that holds ass paper.
AAAAAAAAWWWWWWWWW YEEAAAAAHHH for sure.
nope.  I have the game listed on ebay right now but I was curious to see if it was still messed up so I played it to see.  It took my a whole two matches to find a TDM against a team that seemed to have unlimited care packages and the aimbot hack.  every care package was an ac130 with unlimited raid fire. 
This was definitely the creepiest Twilight Zone I've seen, great adaptation too.
Read the comments. I never said it led to compromised consoles, but it was bad practice and people who don't know what it does shouldn't be using it.  If you're going to sit here and call me out, do some research first before you do.
Dumping out my packed bowl to roll a little J for your brother, this is for Tyler
OMG, that is awesome!
[Here](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6xiy9OBw0CM) is a example of me being stabbed. :/
Not necessarily either of those, actually. He's a very good technical player, for sure, but that's definitely not my genre or desire of styles. I'm enjoying the book for some of the lessons contained in it.  I'm not a good bassist, in fact, I only started about a year ago, but some of the overall points that he makes in the book have helped me with some of the points that would plague a new musician. The best example being his point: "Don't lose the groove if you played a wrong note." Some of the other stuff in the book is a little heavy handed, but that point has definitely improved my playing, because it helped me realize that a mistake should not bring you to a halt, but that you should roll with it and keep going.   Is it groundbreaking? Not really. And to be honest, the whole "spiritual search" thing is a little odd. It's definitely worth at least one read, but perhaps not a year with the book.
Once you reach the point where ending it is more attractive than keeping it is the time to end it. Until then, live the best you can.
Maybe I'm stupid but [TIL](http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/incontinence).
Judge is overstepping his boundaries by charging as an adult only because he pleaded innocent. Seriously though, eleven is old enough to know whether or not you should shoot someone in their sleep.
Humanities - yes. Engineering - no. Science - depends; if you're lucky, no. Arts - lol...
Anyone else got their team picked out already? Amaterasu/Taskmaster/Arthur here. I think. 
I had a friend who was caught smoking in high school. Her grandma made her eat a pack cigarettes as punishment. I'm sure that's bad for your health too, but she learned her lesson.
I don't know why people think a 4gate is so hard to scout.  If his cyber core finishes and he hasn't even started his 2nd gas, he's 4-gating.  If he cuts probes he's 4-gating.  If, at the 5:30 or so mark, you run a ling (it may take 2) into his base and see 3 gateways under construction, he's 4-gating.  Zerg have the far and away the best super-early game scouting abilities of any race, yet they so rarely use them.  Stopping it is a different thing, but scouting it is trivially easy.
I was lifting an industrial air conditioner into the back of a truck with another guy, and the tailgate wouldnt open so it was awkward going.  I ended up dropping one corner of it, with one elbow propped on the truck so my arm couldnt go anywhere.  The metal fins on the back (look at your AC if you don't know what I'm talking about) completely shredded the palm of my hand from the wrist to the fingertips.  It looked a lot like this girls arm, or that picture of the hand that got caught in a paper shredder. 
Its rather varied from corn/soy farms to the ozarks.  She is from Fort Smith so its pretty close to where the book is set.  The 1969 film was shot in Colorado and the biggest difference I saw was the mountains.
While true a lot of thieves would rather get away without killing people, people out to kill each other (personal vendetta or gang related) would benefit from neighbors not calling the cops right away because they didn't hear the shots fired.  PS Not trolling, I would get one if my state would allow it.
Dell is ALMOST Comcast-like in customer support. Almost. 
"The latest news and thoughts about the online FPS Battlefield: Bad Company 2"  Hay guyz!  I want some karma.  Om nom nom nom.
Except the one who's father *was* a gangster, ironically. 
but the Mutiny was such a cool name/color/mascot!
Little did you know that fish was a planned punishment for failure [](/gtroll)
&gt; worth the $100 when you factor in the lifetime warranty.
Now write "do not erase!" sign your bosses name and leave it on the white board forever. 
Gunter glieben glauchen globen
I wish my world was as black and white as yours.  Life would much simpler. I unfortunately live in the real world where everyone is not exactly like me.  Let me explain my comments so they fit into your world.  A)Average weight people with normal hunger thermostats can eat mostly whatever they like.  They feel full when they have eaten a sustainable amount of food.  Not everyone is born this way.  Many people are born with broken feedback systems that don't tell them to stop eating.  They therefore are still hungry even though they have eaten enough calories.  You cannot empathize with these people because YOUR body does not work like this.  You can stop easily after you have eaten enough calories and cannot fathom how hard this would be for someone born without the same regulation.  B)You have the means to go to the albertsons.  You don't live in the projects without easy access to a real grocery store that sells reasonably priced fruit and vegetables.  You are unable to imagine you are in a different social strata where your only option is a corner market where the cheapest food also has the highest calories.  Fruits and vegetables are expensive compared to beefaroni.  C)Source please?  D)Then hooray for you.  You are .00001% of the population that has been self sufficient since they were 7.  You cannot imagine why everyone is just like you and steaming your own vegetables since they were 7.  I live in the real world where poor kids eat school food that is carb heavy and unhealthy.  When they get home they get served crap cheap food, if they even have a meal made for them.  I don't need to know your upbringing.  I know your mindset.  The mindset of one who preaches self control and personal responsibility because YOU, in your own personal life circumstances can do it, and if you can ANYONE can if they want to.  Your mindset does not allow you to put yourself into the worse possible situation and recognize that if you were born as someone else, in a horrible situation, that you may not be able to be that ONE person that would have the tenacity and will to: 1)stop eating, even if you were still hungry, because you knew it was unhealthy. 2)eat less of the canned raviolis that you were served because you knew that the calories were empty calories 3)beg your mom to spend her food stamps on broccoli instead of wonder bread even though wonder breads lasts longer and makes you feel fuller 4)take 2 subways and 3 buses to go to an actual grocery store that sells healthy food options instead of the corner market that only sells processed crap  It may be that no matter what body and which life circumstance you were born into, you would still be a skinny, healthy, and educated about nutrition.  It is possible.  But I don't know if i would be able to overcome all the adversity that many kids face and come out healthy.  Looking at the numbers, I think we can both agree that it is not the norm, and most people are not born with the character and will that would be necessary to do so. 
Considering that she's famous for marrying John Lennon, I think she was pretty good at doing that.
Did you make it?
Hivemind mentality at its finest.
Just want to get this right as it's been a while since i've read the dune books.  Paul is the blind fremen that returns to Arrakeen when his sister is regent and spouts prophecy on the palace steps right? same guy?
Bless you.
You don't understand the magnitude of the laugh I had after reading this.
You know that bad taste you get in your mouth when you brush your teeth then drink orange juice? Totally the work of reptilians.  They put mind control vectors in our sweet fruit juices - the toothpaste only reveals its true taste.
Step 1: Get coupons in mail from Chick Fil A for free w/o purchase  Step 2: Dig into trash can by mail boxes (only works in apartments) Step 3: Get delicious chicken and take money out of their pockets!
&gt; If these new plans simply discourage data hogs from backing up their 120GB pirated movie collection over the 'Net every night, there's no sleep to be lost.  I'm sorry that, as a video student, I like to take precautions to protect my work.  I apologize that the size of these files are quite large and take up a lot of space on my computer.  And I'm sorry for HOGGING YOUR DATA by backing them up online.  Pirated my ass.
fucking DR-DOS or STFU
Yeah well I was +1/+1 with trample.
''turn-based'' Eugh. Obviously he's never played an RTS game in his life.
futurama reference.
It's too bad he had to act like Mascherano when he wanted to leave. There's a right way and a wrong way to leave a club. There's a reason I still love Alonso, but have lost lots of respect for Masch and now Torres.
My mum and dad were not rich but we were OK and money went on my education. (I wasn't that grateful then but i am now). As a consequence, fancy presents were few and far between. I was encouraged not to expect too much compared to my friends.  I was desperate for a dirt bike though. Had been for years and one came up for sale near christmas time that was reasonably priced. I didn't have enough cash though...   So my dad arranged, unbeknownst to my mum, to buy my BMX off me (one they'd bought for me and hep me consistently upgrade over various birthdays) so that i could put that money plus the money i was given for Christmas and my savings together. I had just enough for the bike with what he offered me.  And the kicker ? He kept the BMX at our home so that my nephews could ride it when they came over. That was just his way of going out of his way to help me get something i really wanted but that we couldn't reallybafford.
More reason why CEOs should have a pay cap and anything else should be in stock they can't sell for 2 years. :) 
No, it's incredibly important because you can't have a no-pre-existing-conditions clause without it, otherwise people would just wait until they got sick to purchase insurance. The one doesn't work without the other. 
People will downvote this into the ground but I must agree with you.  *Please feel free to downvote me as well, I will not take it personally.*
This is what Spiceworks, an open-source IT ticketing system that we use at work, does, instead of trying to support a terrible out of date, non-compliant browser.  If you try to access it with IE6, it has a page ie6-no-soup-for-you.html, that has links to update IE or download FF or Opera. 
Whatever - it's part of the game.
Start buying rental houses. Now is the time. Buy 10. Sell them in 5 years or so and buy an apartment complex. Retire.
When it comes to my own posts I'm usually a grammar Nazi myself.  But I think in the title I was thinking about 'bomb site' even though its HQ.
My parents used to make us take a mouthful of vinegar. 
That doesn't make sense in reference to a deck of cards.
Or has she taped her nipples so they dont stick out of the top?
I don't even think its just "Buys capacity from Bell", but more "Uses Bell's lines". 
Good idea. I kind of tried to do that with the turned over dumpster but I didn't do a very good job of it. I might come back and redo this page at some later date when My drawing style has solidified somewhat.
I'm not a mom yet and unfortunately my mom didn't enforce this habit upon me when I was younger so now I pay the price.  
Shit, you're right. Gonna get pummeled.
Is there going to be an entire category devoted to Ronaldo?
Mean Girls is the shit. "You smell like a baby prostitute" I use this all the time.
that is an inside shot and an outside shot, not a very good comparison. 
&gt; If you have a dog or cat, put the dog in its carrier.  FTFY
Easily the Statler Brothers' [Flowers on the Wall](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AE6W1Y25sZY)
What kind of templates? Is there someplace I can read up on this?
Is it? I'll take your word for it, I can never remember.  I have to look it up every time. 
Even a broken clock is right twice a day. 
&gt;The message you're sending out here is "Your girlfriend requires foreplay to get horny? Dump her ass and find someone who is always wet and ready for sex!"  What? No he isn't. He's just saying that some get wet quickly and that's something he enjoys. Basically the same as saying, "That guy last night was fun because he got hard right away which was such a turn-on."
I'm struggling to get my head around the &lt;10 minute shower. Could you give some detail on how you do it?
????? From the instructions. &gt;All weapons brought to campus must be turned in for storage. Trigger locks are required for pistols.
I'm not not licking toads...
Mission accomplished, then?
This almost worked. Your missing apostrophe was your downfall.
Thank you for being so kind.  I think your assessment is probably accurate.
I agree in this case, sure.
you're being a jackass. just admit it and I'll have even a grain of respect left for you. you know you're wrong. you have nothing to back it up. the cost of repairing the room is a lot less than building a house.
get the 7" one .. just kidding
Firstly, I wish I had been as awesome as you at 17.  Secondly, go to San Francisco, not LA.
[](/nomegusta)
I just watched Gilardino's... it's hard to believe he actually did that...
Yeah figured.   But what cheddy said is true.  What's your name / code and I'll see if I can give you tips and shit. 
I don't know how much you know about DD-WRT, but I'm playing with it right now, and it doesn't seem right. When I enable 95kbps up and down, the result is no connection at all. No web pages will load, AIM shuts down, nothing gets through. I upped it to 100kbps, still nothing. When I disable it, everything comes back. I'm having a hard time believing background processes need more than 100kbps. It won't even ping.
as in, a torrent of douche
Pretty noobish myself! Hopefully someone of greater knowledge can help us on this one...   As far as I know, the 6.0 slots are very similar. You can plug 3.0 parts into them, and they'll run at 3.0 speed. The only thing is that on the board you (and I!) have, there are two extra 6.0 slots. Which is great! But the extra two aren't for drives (the Marvel ones, it's all in the manual). So just plug your Blu-Ray burner into the intel 6.0 slot, and then I'm guessing the 1TB HDD is your primary? Plug that into the other intel slot. Then plug your 256GB HDD into one of the Marvel slots. Sorted! And you shouldn't have any problems with that setup (but again, I'm really really new to all this too, so hopefully someone can confirm or correct me...).
But I actually USE the q key for queen production.  I don't, however, use the spacebar.
One of the most tempting things I've seen here... aaggh. Is there anything on those thighs? They're such a lovely caramelized brown.
I haven't completed reading this crap, but there is definitely a racist element to his writings; that Arabs/Middle Easterners are not worthy to protest:  &gt; And they become angry that, in contrast to what they see and hear from abroad, their own lives are unusually miserable in the most elemental sense. Of course, there is no introspective Socrates on hand and walking about to remind the Cairo or Amman Street that their corrupt government is in some part a reification of themselves
That would be funny. Although, the people you would want to *get it* most certainly would not.
When the government grants a monopoly right to a company, that company has obligations to the citizens. Smaller businesses need to basically buy bandwidth from the network owner and resell it. There can be no competition that is vital for unrestricted markets to succeed.
If that's the case, I'd bet the majority of the public are in "POSSESSION of materials intended for the manufacture of methamphetamine"
8 hours is fine as long as the replayability factor is there. Usually it is, but it's not good enough. Maybe i'm too picky but I won't play Fable 2 again just to see what happens if [instead of taking the dog, i take the money](/spoiler) to me, that's just a small trivial thing. If the experience unlocks some vastly different way to play the game (I don't mean a new gun that says pew and bang over and over. Or a new difficulty. I mean a new character or two that plays vastly different) then it's very worth it.   The problem is, not many games do this. Games often don't give me a good reason to want to play through again. Why would I care to beat a Call of Duty Campaign a second time? I won't see anything different. The "wow" factor of all the cool shit happening is not there anymore. Granted, CoD has the multiplayer aspect going for it, but if it didn't, i'd either barrow or rent them.  I do want to say that I like most games with New Game+ modes. Being able to slaughter all with my powerful character that I built is a good incentive for at least one more play through.  Nowadays I just find myself buying games only with strong multiplayer. Will i miss out on dead space 2? Assassins Creed 2? Etc etc? Yep.. but they'll be $10 or less eventually and more worth their one play through. I know dead space 2 is cool, peoples' moms' don't like it, yeah yeah, but I'm glad I just found out it's only about 8 hours long because to me, 59.99 isn't worth 8 hours. No matter how epic.  It all comes down to the player though. Some people are completionists and won't have any qualms with running through games multiple times for different reasons (usually achievements, which don't do it for me) and that's cool. I'm jealous. I wish I was like that. I had a friend who took his time to level all of his dudes to 99 in Chrono Trigger. Fucking awesome, but not necessary to beat it. I always wished I could do something over and over like that and have it entertain me. But then there's people like me I guess. I'll see it once for the cool shit that happens. MAYBE twice if it was amazing as hell (I beat Uncharted 2 twice) but if there's nothing different to do I don't see a point in bothering with it again.  So, yeah. $60 can blow for an 8 hour game. There would have to be some completely different stuff (different character, alternate path through the game, etc.. not just monsters coming from different spots) the second time around to get me to buy dead space 2. All games eventually end up in the "PLEASE FUCKING BUY ME BEFORE THEY THROW ME AWAY!" bin.  It just blows when you're into a game and fucking loving it and BOOM, it's over. You can say the same about movies, books, or any form of entertainment, though.   TL:DR If a short (8hr) game wants to justify being 60$, it better have amazing replay incentives, IMO.
The cables were government business, which, by extension, makes it the people's business.  Wikileaks has never published an 'expose', they release redacted official documents.  You're basically bitching that without mildly lying it would be hard to defraud the NSF... you do get how messed up that is, right?   There's a bunch of problems, one goes like this; there will be loads of people who 'know better' - be they politicians or diplomats or scientists that want to understand the universe that, through lying, will be able to get around public opinion which may be wrong.  Hurray! Go lying. Let's not call it out when we see it.  Then there's a load of other people who *think* they know better than the public. The only way to tell the difference between the two groups is through public criticism and debate which, due to the nature of lying in the first place, is near impossible when lying is institutionally permitted.  So, yeah, through lying on an application you might get funding for a genuinely good cause. Someone else, who might be mental and under-qualified might get the same funding for the same reasons. The only way we can discriminate between the two of you is if the information you both present is scrutinized.
I did get it. My point was that even if he still was, it wouldn't matter.
Looks like the saw dummy
That seems to place the blame incorrectly, if you ask me.
I assume not intended.
damage meter in arena, pro.
Fair enough but I think there are misinformed people in all parties. I don't think it would be more damaging than extra manipulation techniques that parties can use to get rival voters to not bother voting. Its definitely less democratic. People voting default is definitely wrong, but I think it balances out on both sides so it's not as big a problem as say having people not vote. The fact that there is a 'none of the above' option also seals the deal for me. It means it would only take an actual ass to vote for something they don't understand when they could vote blank. I don't think thats significant enough to turn the tide of any election.
her vagine hangs like wizards sleeve 
Pull my fingah!
I am in agreement.  The lady bits are the chum, and the man participates in the feeding frenzy. We are **PIONEERS**
you are a great friend! (what a nice thing to do for your friend)
I have an identical cap.
I also just got offered Miller, Hossa, Burns for St. Louis, Lucic, and Subban.  What you guys think?
Not a parking story, but something similar.   In highschool I would drive my dads exceptionally bulky Chevy pickup to school. Now, my family was by no means rich so this thing was a guzzler. The muffler was missing, it was loud, it had a garbage bag for a back window for awhile but.. man.. I loved it.   So I was driving down a country road that was an artery into the city. Most of my buddies would take this same road to school in the morning so often I'd end up following one or two on our way in.   My truck was kind of a joke to everyone as it was so loud and obnoxious. So, one day I got into a bit of a race with my friend that I'd met at one of the intersections. This road was pretty abandoned, so we'd pass each other, cut each other off and slow right down. We were both howling the whole time. Until we came to a light. He made the green, I didn't. So we separated.   About this time a s00ped up Honda Civic (you know the type) pulls up behind me. Apparently he'd seen the whole thing from a distance. It was piloted by two spiky haired Jersey Shore types. He revs his engine behind me and pull up real close.   We leave the intersection and he flies around in front of me, instantly slowing down. Rolls down his windows, opens his sunroof and blast gino beats. Starts shooting me the finger and sticking their spiky heads out the window and laughing.   This goes on for twenty mins.   Finally I'm sick of it. I engage my four wheel drive, wait for a minute when he's not looking and adjusting his gino beats, and floor it. I come around on the shoulder to his right, spin my tires as I pass spraying gravel as his nicely washed civic, throw him a nice finger, and let my eight cylinders of muffler-free glory carry me far ahead of him.   Of course he tries to catch up but doesn't. We come to a stop about 3 km up the road, he pulls up and revs his engine. I shift into neutral and drown him out with my muffler-free-garbage-bag-window trucks engine and we part ways with him shooting me the finger.   feltgoodman. 
 Im living in jersey so ill be riding an average of 4-5 ft waves nothing too crazy if that helps.
No, decent people don't go and try to kick a guys ass for saying hello to someone, that's fucked up.
Y'all are just mad cuz God is stylin' on you
I have one, not so much science as PSA having to do with holding down B next to the mcom even if the progress bar has disappeared.
&gt; I knew a mom who put gin in her baby's bottle w/ juice so she'd go to slee  While I would consider that deplorable, please don't exaggerate. When children are teething, damn near nothing else gives them any comfort. Though, you don't use enough to pour... we're talking getting your finger wet and rubbing it on their gums.  Though, our daughter started liking that too much.
Anytime, I have my most sophisticated conversations on reddit it seems, which is a little saddening.  Most of the people I actually know either don't, can't, or won't put much thought into much of anything.
They can produce it in south-asian sweatshops. Close enough.
What would it take for Reddit, or a group of Redditors, to be an official shirt sponsor? 
There's only one thing worse than annoying Apple fanboys:  Annoying anti-apple fanboys.
Rip or curved claw?  Fiberglass wood or steel?  My other job is that I make a catolog and website that sells tools ya hear what I'm sayin yo?
How does it work in terms of tournament winnings?  Do players get a monthly salary + a cut of the winning? Is it an even split more or less between what the player keeps and what the manager/team gets in order to fund operations? 
Thank you I missed being 6-pooled or cannon rushed.
&gt; I'm about 1/3 of the way through ME on PC but haven't had time to finish it haha.  Got bored, or had to study, or another game caught your attention?
go to any major boardwalk/beach destination.. actually anyplace with tourists.. the sketch artists usually pretty decent
Try it.. then... then you'll know why.
This is gonna drive me crazy, i better get a picture of this chick with just a sweater on 
My father / ate deep-fried macaroni And had a heart attack
potato or ricotta gnocchi? i think this would go well with the potato texture.  I would worry about ricotta gnocchi with the butter chicken, potential mush in a bowl
You dont watch too many bulls games do you? Thats Stacey King and hes a great commentator, his comments are hilarious!   http://www.nba.com/bulls/stacey-king-soundboard.html
If you've been a vegetarian your whole life, you probably don't have the enzymes to digest meat anyway.
love, love, love
Fuck you that was my response! I see the headline and think "OOH I'M SO ORIGINAL AND WITTY I'M GONNA WRITE ITS BECAUSE THE EGYPTIANS ARE GONE!"  Fuck.  I'm nothing special. Just another cog in the hivemind.
I refuse to change my view on this matter.
Win.
I'm a double X-er.
Somebody needs to give you tattoo removal cream.
**You're an idiot if you think the guy volunteered to go fight a war.**  The realness of the situation is that the man volunteered to become part of the armed forces which defend the country, *probably* because it was one of the most suitable ways for him to *provide for his family*.  Some people are accountants. Some are chemical engineers. Some are ditch diggers. Some are soldiers.  It's a job, and as with any job, you have a boss. That boss is the American Government, say what you will about the company - but faulting the workers for trying to earn a living is just ignorant.  To me, it's pretty clear you don't understand the way the system works.  This (and damn near every) country needs a standing army in today's world. If not the consequences are pretty obvious. Some people take the job and duty of being that force. Even if it gets abused (or not) by the governing body.
Fatherless child for rent.
It's cool, I was fairly certain my request was not going to be received well anyways. I just wanted to see if anyone out there had similar stats and wanted to teamup so we could *DOMINATE*
Just type "national mosaic" into your address bar on firefox or chrome.  It lets you interpret the weather yourself.
There is no cost to download a GB and if there is one, it's $0.02, not $1, not $2, not anything.  It's extremely hard to "clog the pipe" on a 7 MBPS connection. Japan have 160 MBPS and certainly people who download fast. Yet they have unlimited internet.  But let's agree for a second and say these people DO clog the internet - I believe we can both say that at 3AM, barely anyone uses the "pipes" compared to, let's say, 8PM. Yet Bell wants to charge $2.00 per GB anyway.  This is profit-oriented, period. Almost EVERY country in the world offers unlimited internet.  25GB is an absolute farce and can be reached in a day.
My best translation of what that says: "Made yourself lighter?" (in reference to the load you just expelled. Curiously, the gender inflection is directed at females.) "Then freshen up". Knowing what the sign said just confused me more, frankly.
Austin here.
This works. Thanks!
Well if you don't seem to appreciate your small breasts, allow us to do it for you! (warning: Pics are needed)
Wrong. Console is irrelevant; the gamertag owns the purchase.
Haha. I went to the high school, Bob Jones Academy in 9th grade and was asked not to come back. I was on "spiritual probation" and didn't fit in. Remember the Snack Shop? Back in the day when you were 14 and it was cool to keep a rubber in your wallet, I opened it to pay for a meal and the rubber fell out. A small crowd gathered and made this huge deal over it.  That place sucked.
I don't have any prejudices against analytic philosophy, and I was only joking really when I remanded the kid for his explanation of structuralism as analytic. I don't really care either way, it's just disheartening to see so much cynicism and unwarranted scrutiny in r/philosophy. The few good topics this subreddit does produce are limited by this fact.  The analytic/continental distinction is silly, but it exists in reality as part of history. I do believe, however, that there is worthwhile philosophy and stuff that is complete junk. I have my views of the continental tradition and what it entails, and this may be more exclusive or expansive depending on the person. It's hard to see philosophers with such distaste for argument and such a lust for downvoting.
Love this band.
&gt;: religion tied to citizenship documents and the bloody founding document of the state.  Equally lame.  Sorry but you have failed to back up your assertion.
what the fuck?  NSFL.  Actually, NSFAnything.  You think I would learn not to click on these things...  I'm going to go cry in the shower now.
thanks
How the hell did you get him to wear that thing!?
He didn't put a banana in the tailpipe, he keyed it. 
Might check out the [YMCA Y-guides](http://www.ymcatriangle.org/Y_Guides.aspx) program.  Specifically for dads with daughters.  They have a religous base, and that might or might not be your thing.  I'm atheist, but bite the bullet and do the Boy Scout thing because the benefits for your kid far outweigh any discomfort.  If it is in your area, I would recommend going to a meeting and checking them out.
I expected that a federal law which dealt with health care would be found to be outside of the enumerated powers granted to congress. Perhaps somewhere in the health care bill it actually had something to do with commerce amongst states or maybe somewhere there was a restriction upon the federal government itself. I wouldn't have thought those bits would be called unconstitutional (but then, I didn't read the bill either). I [consistently](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/e08b4/iama_conservative_am_i_even_welcome_on_reddit/c14az3x) rail against the federal government for exceeding their limited powers under Article 1, Section 8 of the constitution. So, yeah...I'm not surprised in the slightest that it was found to be entirely unconstitutional.
Aye!
Seriously...if you people up north aren't rioting and throwing burning trashcans around by midnight tonight over this issue...you are no longer allowed to bitch at us down in the states about anything. 
I present: the hipsterest bike ever. http://missionmission.files.wordpress.com/2010/09/hipsterest-bike.gif
I've had the snowblower out on the tractor maybe 15 times so far this year.  
Dual Quad Pentium 3.2??  HOLY CRAP THAT'S SUCH A GOOD COMPUTER!
XON &gt; edit XOM not XON... dur...  QQQQ / QQEW  DVN  Energy isn't getting cheaper and technology is a good long term bet as well.   Better yet, go buy a book on Financial Planning and read it. If you're smart enough to earn the money, you're smart enough to decide what to do with it.
Obviously it's metaphoric imagery.  Until they find one then it's proof the bible is right.
Best use of this I've seen yet.
I look at it like the disease model. If you look at it like the Malaria model. We know the Malaria is spread by mosquitos  so the more mosquito around the more cases of malaria you get. Some people get never get malaria no matter how many times someone get bitten by mosquitos. Some people get it very easily, even if they are very careful use mosquito netting and use repellant. Most people just have to take precautions and they can avoid the disease. But the more and more mosquitos there the harder and harder it is to avoid getting infected. So if you drain the swamp and keep the mosquito population down there are fewer and fewer people who get sick. How this fits in with obesity is our environment is more conducive to obesity as in more access to sugary foods and the lack of exercise in normal  activities. So that creates the environment for more people to become obese who normally would not be that way.  So society is more responsible for "Draining the Swamp". That being said once you have gotten obese you are responsible for taking care of yourself and treating it.   So really the arguments are "Put down the fork and move more" and "it is society's/genetics fault I am fat" both have some truth to them.
DAE notice the look in the [last frame](http://lookofdisapproval.com/)
It's been good discussions.  I'm glad we've reached that point. I should like look into the various controlled territories in Bavaria and see how they treated their people as opposed to other rulers of the day.  Though they may not of stated explicitly inalienable God given right, they may have ruled with that mind.  The gray areas are where they ruled and didn't allow basic human rights. Men that did not want their authority challanged (as a theistic God would) would either rule as a tyrant posing as God's hand or rule as a respector of mankind.  Though its hard to truly judge a nation's ruling principles when they are handed down from the top unquestionable. In the OT, it seemed as if God was against monacrhy...but the people of isreal cried out to God for a king. They got what they wanted, and it didn't turn out all that well.  There were generations upon generations of corrupted rulers. I suppose if anything, finding Christian principles in monarchies would be difficult.  The believe judges of the day had the sense that absolute power corrupts absolutely.
Uh, actually they got bigger :(  I went from the left photo (115 lbs) to 154 and have been working my way down to where I am now. Have lost weight everywhere but the breasts it seems.
Another indirect nerf to Evelynn. Poor blue girl.
Lisa! In this house we obey the laws of thermodynamics!
Anyone who kills people in the name of God is a radical in my mind.
48.6%? Why NOT 100%!
Did people need any more reasons to avoid Plenty of Herpes - er, I mean Fish?
A Marc Joseph's filet mignon dinner, with creamed spinach, roasted home-fries with onions, and two slices of their thick-cut bacon for an appetizer.  If you're ever in Manhattan, look them up. 
Hahah awesome, I'd be more of a marine, classic dime-a-dozen type guy! I used to date a girl that lived in Davie which is pretty much Fort Laud. I hope they like the weather down there!
"He no longer wears sweat pants because the crotch wears out too quickly."  "Yar!  That just replaced the whale in me nightmares!"
I hadn't thought of the safety aspect of flickering lights (possible short I imagine.) I'll remove the fuse for the radio asap until I can get it into a Nissan mechanic. Thanks for the tip. 
Any idea what the starting 11 will look like considering Lampard's health? Malouda moved back, maybe?
Blue is only ~2 hours away
I think you are very much so jumping the gun here.   From the sound of things you've only done photography. And I can tell you right now that you will be very much shocked how much work there goes into making just ONE minute of quality cinema, let alone a full feature. And you'll also be shocked how you don't know shit about filmmaking ;)  So start by doing a one minute film. Then expand to five minutes. Then 10. There is no way in hell that you'll be making a full feature movie that's not ridiculous in your first try.  Although I admire your gusto!   (Back on topic - I'D go for a 7D rather then a 5D if I were in your shoes. Yes, the 5D has a larger sensor but the 7D is a better all round camera. It's also newer, and cheaper)
No worries man, I hear ya. I just thought it was a good one, for once. 
Shoulda cloned wolverine, mele weapons have less chance to miss. But made wolverine a girl. And hot. Stupid empire. 
/me smacks your hand....  Don't be Greedy!
DUCKTALES
If you're not careful Reddit will proxy your schedule and steal *all* of your time.
[Todd's Unique Dining](http://bit.ly/g6BuoJ)   I adore [this](http://bit.ly/hn5IjD) pancake house   [Raku](http://bit.ly/eh05ZP) (Japanese)   The Black Bear Diner   At Tropicana and Jones   Seriously rocks!
Manchester United PLZ!!!
You go mutas vs P? Won't mass gate just destroy you?
Awesome! I can't wait to hear how it turns out!   Edit: Unlike toddlers on the internet with no real life experience,  I don't expect everyone to think like me, and have the same outcomes as I have had. Dude asked what we would do and I told him what I would do. I didn't ask what you would do because I don't care. It is so tiresome when self righteous pricks think their way is the only way. Since you've decided something is right for you, then it must be right for everybody. And because you disagree with me you're going to badger me with your high opinion of yourself. Note that I am not disagreeing with you. What you would have done in my situation is of no interest to me. You've just judged me as not being a descent human being because I don't go around forcing everyone to be as honest as I think they ought to be. That's quite a high and mighty position to take. I sincerely doubt you deserve it.
Well technically he's already a stand-up comedian, he just doesn't tell one liners. He tells humourous anecdotes which I think still qualifies on some level. 
You can try to rip your balls off with your hands, and dump the nuts out. Then use the sack as a bag to transer blood from your sack wound to your head.
Like a Fox! - Wait... that's not right...
I really liked it and thought it was well done.  It was weird, without a doubt, but it made sense, it just didn't spell it out.
&gt;For instance, getting a veggie burrito at Moe's with no cheese isn't going to set off many questions.  I find that it does even at places like that. But then I live in an area where if you don't have a huge slab of meat on your plate people ask, "Oh, are you not eating?" *sigh*
This is a real totem. Awesome. Just like the weighted dice, you'd only know if you got hold of it. 
Why...that's a terrible thing to say!
If there's no contact information linked on the website, is there an easy way to get the person's info who's sitting on the domain? Sorry, domain-noob.
and my cleat!
What departments do you and they opt for? Maybe you are in a more competitive graduate department.
BBC is the standard, Al Jazeera is the new star.  You can cite Al Jazeera, but your class experience will be more peaceful if you back up Al Jazeera with BBC where you can.
You should just do a live Reddit show and we'll send you money
Yes, lets call something I deal with every day bullshit and dismiss it out of hand instead of taking the opportunity to learn something. Actually we pay for the "hops" out of our own pocket. Where we are supposed to be is where we are. Your thoughts verge on isolationist, which is insanity. 
How far is it? You could always borrow two shopping carts from QFC and attach them to each side of your bike like sidecars.
No.  My Youtube name's the same as my Reddit name, and equally as shitty at posting. :)
Anyone see any coverage of this on corp media that was ALL over ever few hundred tea party riot?
Source?
You are wrong on so many counts, I can only assume you work for one of the mentioned companies.  This is dead simple to sort out. Go look at Bell and Shaw's financial reports. They have plenty of profit. A few months ago Shaw put out a PR on their corporate site bragging of profit levels in their internet division being the highest of any ISP in North America.  Bandwidth is getting cheaper every day. ISPs themselves have given figures for costs in other contexts, it's usually about $0.02/GB. Other reports have said doubling capacity only costs about $7/subscriber.  I run a quarter-cage at a datacentre not far from where I live. I pay less than $300 for 5 terabytes/mo, which works out to $0.06/GB, and that includes the facilities, network infrastructure, and 24-hour security and monitoring. These people want to charge $2/GB. That's like having to pay $1,000,000 for a base-model Honda Civic. It is fucking retarded.  If this was really about raising capital, they'd increase the cost of their packages, and they certainly wouldn't be reducing the included bandwidth amounts. Or they would do what every single other company does when they need operating capital for expansion projects: raise it on the markets.  Monthly package charges cover the operation and infrastructure costs. They always have, and always will. They have been perfectly sustainable in the past, and continue to be financially viable and profitable without UBB.   This is a profit grab and nothing else.  ------------------ Edit to add quote and source: "Shaw continues to be recognized as one of the best operators in North America and maintains superior margins which exceeded 45% on a consolidated basis and 48% for cable for FY 2010" From [Jan 13 2011 Investor Presentation](http://www.shaw.ca/NR/rdonlyres/D2473981-CEEB-41B9-A10A-4FDD56C16D88/0/AGMPresentationJanuary132011.pdf).
"This video contains content from National Geographic, who has blocked it in your country on copyright grounds."
I hear you man. I wasnt trying to say that no one in the world cares about hearing that it is organic, I just meant that in the community where I was when a farmer said that he didnt use pesticides or GM food, they trusted him and that was good enough.
God exists outside of reason. Science is humanity's interpretation of nature. Do you suggest that everything in existence can be measured empirically? How about existence itself?
Definitely fighting off the waste of space feelings. I know that I feel better on the days when I go to businesses in person and speak to actual people instead of just filling out apps all day. thanks for the help!
As in,... he's a PROFESSIONAL gamer?
Heard it through the grapevine
I never tried any such drugs.
This.
But that is just your opinion of how CPS should operate. I don't disagree with you that CPS should operate along these lines. The reality is that CPS is already defining "neglect and abuse" in ways that are well outside of what you would like.  Some states already have: Failure to educate your child, failure to provide special medical or mental treatments, withholding specific medical or withholding specific nutrition.. These are all easily grouped with "failure to provide nutrition that prevents  your child from having life-threatening obesity". 
wont smell good, but it'll keep you warm
I don't disagree.
I love all these awesome mods for new creatures and such, my only gripe, is that i mainly play on an smp server with friends so most of these awesome mods are lost upon me. Personally having awesome buildings is less cool if I cant show it off in person to a fried. And theses mods are super awesome, but you cant play with them in a shared enviroment.
It's s a broken model and such greed shouldn't have infested the web. Key word was infested. 
For what it's worth. [:)](http://i.imgur.com/Fcf2Q.jpg)
Both of them.
Everybody already knew.
It's gotten to the point that, before I buy hardware from any company, I spend a few minutes searching through their website for drivers/firmware etc for a couple of random old devices. If I can't find it, they miss out on a sale.
Why would they run their party any differently than they run the country?
if he thinks making that face is gonna make me give him his wallet back, he is mistaken
There isn't a question here, is there? You need to edit to add both your ages too. Please see the guidelines at the right. 
And by "ass" I mean "hero".
Sex and the City 2
Agreed. The Pistons are in worse shape because they're stuck with overpaid players that are lucky to reach a playoff spot. They should really blow up the team and rebuilt with a solid core group of players.
The cord on my Macbook Pro started getting loose after about a year and was out of warranty.  I went to the Apple store and they handed me a new one without even asking to look up my serial number.  Bastards!  Am I doing it right?
&gt;The reason is the word "belief" is so close to the word "faith".  I understand that still. That does not make them the same word and they still have their respective meanings.  &gt;Belief, -implies- (not just the definition, but the common usage) a reliance on feeling rather than thought.  That's not true at all. People use many different forms of the word to express plenty of things other than religious beliefs.   &gt;"I believe you ran that red light."  It boils down to "I hold x to be true", where x is any form of cognitive content.
"meh" was my overall impression when I saw them in person.
Why do you think I have daddy issues myself?
Something about how it proved he was a red....
We in the UK call it cans of whatever the drink is called.
And stock both with 10 bags of mini-carrots and Preparation-H.
I was a diver in college, I was once doing a reverse (gainer) 2.5 and hit my legs on the ol diving board...I feel your pain.  I didn't break anything but had a gash...my coach made me do it again before he would let me leave practice...I'm glad he did, it saved me from being a head case.  Though you seem to have a good head on your shoulders, 1 bad injury out of all the sucess is something to be thankful of, keep up the gymnastics, maybe someday you can use those skills in a real sport like diving :)  just teasing.
so i admit i read through a few to see if the script makes deb curse a lot or if she ad-libs.
Let me restate... what politicians vote against a tax cut?   Even the extension of the Bush tax cuts for the wealthy went thru even though they were vastly unpopular.  Judges can't vote in the senate.
Sewing a female skill? Tell that to soldiers back in the day. You can find lots of pictures of soldier sewing during WWII and earlier. Even my ex's dad, who was in the Marines, maintained that everyone, man and woman, should have basic sewing skills. It was something he learned in the military.  But, er, glad to know that driving manual cars is a female skill!  (I can bring home the bacon, fry it up in a pan, and also make sweaters into toddler dresses: http://farm6.static.flickr.com/5099/5390765845_c4669c3ae9.jpg And drive manual and take put the trash, which is apparently now a skill we ladies are learning.)  My husband is also incapable of building a log cabin or downing a rampaging bear. I mourn the loss of skills in today's man...
Robots.
This is for DSL, not Cable. It's not that horrible for a lot of people.
I needed this after the awful day I've had. Too funny!!
I am also scared when people don't believe in my world view.  What is this world coming too ??
I never steal a teammates care package, but I will take it if he's nowhere to be found.  The only reason you shouldn't be able to get your care package first is that you got killed.  If it happened to me, I'd rather my teammates got it than the enemy.  There's no other way they should be able to take it, considering you get your own care package much faster than anyone else can.
My sister and brother in law have already enlisted my brother to dress as Santa every single year for their daughter (and any future kids). They want to attract attention off themselves, and avoid having Santa change from year to year.
need someone who will model whatever you ask?  (that's joke you don't have to answer that)  in your other posts you mention you weren't originally in the industry, what are some of the main differences you see between where you were and the games industry? pros, cons, etc.  what is the hardest part about the industry and more specifically, the transition you made?  and lastly, any advice for a recent grad who has delusions of a career making video games?  thanks for the AMAA
The color harmony is amazing between the bus / sidewalk and the grey buildings / street / lady. And what a classy lady too. This definitely makes me reminisce of my days in SF. Thanks for sharing!
And Kamprad is in his 80s. I have a feeling he's talking about the amount of time they've spent in industry, not the amount of time they've lived for.
For a while I had a long distant relationship (currently I am in the same one but now we live together). Both people have to work at the relationship and both parties might need to make some changes. However, we both knew that studies and productive activities were important not only for the one person, but for both of us. If the one person couldn't do what they wanted to do, then the time we would spend together would not be happy. In times that we really were busy, I would take a few minutes every now and then just to call and say hi to her. Now, if she has to study or something, I hang out with her while she is eating or taking a break. 
I can't find a price for the Asus board you mentioned... is that because of the recall? (I use newegg almost exclusively) So the XFX PSU that you mentioned is better why exactly? More stable output or what? I also noticed that it is only 650W. Am I going to need anything more than that for a rig like this or will that do? Wired mice seem to be the right thing to have for gaming, yes? I have another question about the monitors as well. I don't know that I really need them, as I have a 32" 720p LCD and a 42" 1080p LCD too. Is it a good idea to game with the smaller screens? Does it make a difference? I know they aren't too expensive so maybe they will be an afterthought. Your advice has been very valuable, thank you!
**I like to move it, move it!**
I love gun rights, but this seems ripe for trolling.  It reminds me of the disabled lawsuit-happy trolls in California, hunting for businesses that lacked wheelchair ramps so that they could slap them with lawsuits.  I can just imagine people putting themselves in situations hoping to be stopped for firearm carry, so that they can win the Free Car Lottery.
I agree.  This looks fake.  Also, the resolution is wrong.  Why was it uploaded with 1080P, when the quality of the video doesn't improve at that resolution?
Well I guess I can't argue with that.
Do you have any system restrictions?
Did you seriously offer it up to your girlfriend?  Like it was an Ipod or some shit? What did you think she was going to say?  "Oh sure I'll take it, I've been meaning to get one of those!"
Thanks, that's helpful data for my study here.
I don't know, there's a pretty big difference between the realism of going into battle in a bikini and having wings on a helmet. The former is simply laughable even to people with little or no knowledge in the area of medieval weapons and armour (like me).  I can come up with several plausible reasons why you might have wings on a helmet, notwithstanding the loss of practicality in protecting your body, such as psychological effects on your enemies, ego, or ease of distinguishing friend from foe in the confusion of battle.
If it was warm, I suggest hiking through outdoor bound NYC. However, since it's cold, maybe karaoke, laser tag, bowling, ice skating. You know, something active. 
More specifically, "exempt" license plates don't have to pay registration fees/taxes since it doesn't make a lot of sense to have the government paying taxes to itself.  They are certainly not exempt from following the same laws everyone else does.
You sir, are a very very strange person. Me like it! Upvote!
You can be committed without being entirely monogamous. 
You have just experienced what a lot of people who have come to terms with an addiction have experienced. The existential explosion of meaninglessness will simmer down when you remember how to live life again.  I recommend volunteering the same amount of time you spent playing to 1) cleaning your goddamn place from top to bottom; 2) exercising; 3) volunteering to help make a positive difference is someone else's life for at least 3 months (volunteermatch.org can be a good resource to find volunteer opportunities in your area).  
I'm a guy and I like this.
How would we know who else you hear?  :)
harry jalapeno indeed.
[Relevant](http://farm3.static.flickr.com/2596/4223503156_f0c6ba170c.jpg)
I don't get it. Are you suggesting they look alike? Or is there some inside joke I'm missing?
You could say that Queensland is in the ... *DANGER ZONE!*
Did I use my name on facebook? fuck..lol. I rarely do block out names...I didn't in Wow, didn't in minecraft etc...are we supposed to? Is there danger involved?
This is exactly what would've happened if Calvin ever asked his MOM for advice.
There's two courses related to The Wire at Duke. One is the Writing 20 class Helio500 talked about, the other is an elective in Cul Anth/African American Studies. It is a hoooooorible class where the teacher didn't let the show bring out topics and then discuss the issues involved like the show could clearly do. She tried to talk about very deep, abstract issues and barely have the show demonstrate it with a short clip. It was exactly backward of how a class on a show like this could be done. It was great that the school is making use of the show as a source, but it wasn't doing it well.  tl;dr Duke has 2 courses on the Wire, only one is done well
If you had left a minute earlier the driver of the other car would also have left a minute earlier, or a disruption in the traffic would have accommodated for your movements. Everything is predetermined no need to feel afraid.
You're a moron.  **CNN is strongly biased favorably towards White people.**
You should prolly STFU since you're not sure of the facts.
If so then I'm not sure why you made this submission.
Yeah I was never impressed by his lyrics, but that mightve been what really turned me off Cudi.  I mean, really? that's his "thang", needless endangerment of others?
FIFA will probably turn a blind eye to this.
I don't know atm, if I knew how much it would probably make me vomit.  Will update when I get all the the RP info into my spreadsheet.  Edit: Ok, using the [RP info from this page](http://leagueoflegends.wikia.com/wiki/Riot_Points) the total RP cost for all champions atm is 51,665.  Assuming the best deal of RP to USD (144 RP/USD) the total cost in USD is $358.79 rounded up to the nearest cent.  I am once again disgusted.
Incidentally, I just checked out the company your are referring to, and I must pay 47$ for 60GB +2$/GB overage, or 107$ for 175 GB +1$/GB overage if I were to go with them. This is over double what you are saying.  I guess it must differ by location or something?  Not that it really matters, because my apartment complex is wired for only 1 internet provider. Fuck monopolizing.  EDIT: I think that what people are outraged about is the "false scarcity" the ISPs are forcing. Say you went to a restaurant, and you ordered the chicken breast: 15$. Then you said you wanted a salad and a beer with that. Since this is more than just the basic meal you came in for (despite the fact that you wanted more than just chicken), they obviously have to charge you more for that. That makes sense, I agree with you on that. Now say it costs the restaurant 2$ for the salad and 1$ for the beer. According to UBB logic, they can therefore charge you $200 for the salad, and $100 for the beer.
you are super awesome.
Well, with constant exercise, it wouldn't. Also, if low gravity was the only problem, we're probably better off with Mars than the Moon.
Another Paulite playing fast and loose with the truth. Paul called his fundraisers "tea parties." That's where the similarity ends.  Just because Paul was the first to use the phrase in a recent campaign doesn't mean he started it.  Ron Paul's sycophants would claim the Good Doctor invented oxygen, if they thought they could get away with it.
Looks like the author is closely testing TST before release. I observed no behavioral changes at all. Works great.
So just about every other student is an informant.
Eric Bauman?
Apologize for teaching your child to play terran.
hold a 25lb plate in front of you and squat again and see if your form improves. if it does, you need to strengthen your abs and hips flexors in order to generate more tension. if it doesn't you have really tight hamstrings or other mobility issues
I use the acute brain trauma in these arguments:  If one sharp blow to the head can severely damage the cognitive functions of the brain to the point where no "personality" even remains, why does the utter destruction of that same brain activity upon death lead someone to believe that personality is restored somewhere?
run and tell that homeboy
Ok that seems to make sense.  How did you get the non download manager one? That one still 404s for me...perhaps you should mirror it for OP?
Thanks. I couldn't figure out what font to use.
I'm actually saying to get the 5770 since it's the same price after rebate. If you don't want to do the rebate though, the 5750 is fine :)  They are compatible and based on your CPU, it should be in a motherboard that will work with everything. I don't know of one that will handle an Athlon II 635 that won't take a PCI-E graphics card and that's all you're getting here.
This is one awkward boat.
use rebase rather than merge?  You don't want the merge behavior, you want the rebase behavior, based on your description.
Allow me to rephrase that:  "If you want anything from me, whether it's a job, or money, or empathy, or respect, you cannot opt out of certain rules just because you don't care."
Is this selling Earth? I think I have some spare change in the couch if there is no buyers...
Yeah, it might be true, a lot of people these days don't have the skills that were needed for daily life only a few decades ago... but the implication of using phrases like "Gen Y women [are] *woefully behind* their older counterparts" drives me up the wall.
http://pewglobal.org/2010/12/02/muslims-around-the-world-divided-on-hamas-and-hezbollah/  No data on Tunesia, but Egypt is second only to Jordan in their support for the death penalty for apostasy for instance. I wouldn't call that peaceful or nonviolent. And that is most certainly religiously motivated. 
You've been busy today. And AWESOME.
Oh yeah, I for sure told him to pour them. IMO it's a pretty essential habit to get into if you really want to start appreciating the full flavor of the beer.  You're right on the Sam Smith's. Mu mistake, I could have sworn I'd gotten it in clear bottles before, but all my bottles upstairs are brown.
Be a big brother.  Don't try to be her father because as you both get older and she starts to hit that rebellious stage in her life.  She will resent you and your rules.
No. When Republicans stop dragging our country into the shitter for the sake of corporate greed, then we will start being nice to them. I want liberals in the USA to protest, and quit running for office, just so people can see how quickly the GOP will tank the country(after I get accepted to grad school in Canada, of course), and I want everyone over the age of 50 to hurry the fuck up and die. 
Who doesn't?
&gt;for 300$  How many people are on their first xbox360 from 2005?  Yeah lets go ahead and make that 600 to 900 USD.
She's just trying to see where they're coming from.
Let me think... I usually play pretty fair against the players. I had a player portraying an elf maiden(under an oath of virginity - not a prestige class feature or anything, this was in 2nd ed, just added for character) raped by a demon, though. Finding out she was pregnant, she did herself in.  This was in no way whatsoever related to the fact that the week before, I as a player was flung 200 yards by a catapult staircase landing in an orc cesspool, in a game DM'ed by the same player. *Cough*  Great RP by the player, though.
I'll believe it when I see it. So far the forecasts this winter have been terrible. I want a real stormy damnit.
Excellent points. See my explanation for the recommendation a little farther down.  EDIT: Or apparently above. 
Not bad, but it could be better allocated in my opinion.  That card isn't bad but it's a bit outdated since the GTX 500 cards are now out. Your PSU is overkill for two GTX 470s; a 750-850 watt is plenty for two of those cards. I'd bump down the PSU a bit and go for something made by Corsair, Antec, Seasonic, or XFX. If you're fine with going with an AMD card, the Radeon HD 6870 performs similarly to the GTX 470, but it runs cooler and consumes less power in the process. [This XFX 6870](http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16814150506) is $240 but has a $40 mail-in rebate; if you decide to go with a 6870, a 650-watt PSU will be plenty for two of those cards. The newly-released GTX 560 just came out and outperforms the 6870 for $250 if you're able to spend that much.  To be honest, I think the Antec 900 is an... okay case. The build quality is certainly great but for how big it is, I've heard bad things about its cable management and the thing is a dust magnet due to the lack of dust filters. I'd go for a Cooler Master CM 690 II instead but it's up to you. Lian-Li also has some great case offering as well.  Great hard drive, but the [1TB Samsung Spinpoint F3](http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16822152185) is just $5 more on Newegg, performs very similarly in read and write speeds, and can store twice as much data. It's a fast, reliable hard drive and I personally think it's a better deal than the Western Digital drive you're looking at, but it's up to you.  Note that the motherboard you're getting is a Micro ATX board, and that Intel is recalling their Sandy Bridge stuff at the moment due to a chipset problem, so unfortunately you'll have to wait a bit before you can get an i5-2500K again. Once the motherboards are fixed and everything is re-released, go for the 2500k if you want to overclock. Since you're getting an ATX case, I'd go for an ATX motherboard since Micro ATX doesn't offer as much expandability and you're getting a case that fits ATX motherboard anyway. If the ASUS P8P67 Pro doesn't have any issues when it's re-released, I'd get that motherboard or the Gigabyte P67A-UD4 if you want to run a good SLI/Crossfire setup in the future.  I hope this helps, and best of luck! :)
As if this were a conversation about regulation vs deregulation in the context of the current economic depression? Whether Ron Paul is right about anything is irrelevant. The only information about him important here is that he was critical of Bush for various reasons, particularly fiscal irresponsibility and foreign policy. A large segment of the Tea Party was also critical of Bush for those very same reasons. That's it. To avoid that point, you're just changing the subject. It's very clear to me that you're not interested in actually discussing the issue, but rather trolling. Adieu.
Why don't you give it a try yourself? Also their forums are there too.  http://www.interstellarmarines.com/
If only more people saw this... realized that despite the Big Lie of America ( the everyone has an even chance myth ) most people dont have much but what they get served up with... 
You are two weeks late.
Any good designer knows the way to a clients heart is through their stomach.
Bigger than average guys (I'm 5'10, I like big hips/shoulders on a guy) who are somewhat nerdy, and 9 times out of 10, db or API engineers. Actual LOOKS are kind of all over the map, although I do for some reason find men who have a cleft chin much more attractive as a whole. I don't notice the chin thing until I look for it, but there must be something about facial structure of men with it because it's ALWAYS there on faces I think are hot.  Ridiculous that I go so much to type that they're even a specific kind of engineer, but my track record's pretty damn solid on that. It's been completely accidental, but...that's my type. 
That was amazing. We should be friends. In my 2 years in san Diego I've havnt seen any one do something like that.
Interestingly enough, my RES shows that he currently has 7 upvotes and 4 downvotes, while I have 10 upvotes and 2 downvotes.  So I only garnered one more vote, though more of mine were positive.  When I commented, I believe he had one up and two down (or one down, maybe).  So, even after my comment, people still came along and were like "Fuck this guy's opinion".
I have the opposite problem.  I can too easily picture things and recall other senses I've encountered: taste, sound, smells, touch, proprioception and vestibular input, so it's like I'm walking around in some 7D movie at inopportune parts of the day.  However, it's pretty awesome when reading or when I close my eyes before sleep.  However, I don't remember dreams.
I'd use the bucket and make it all orange and call it a day
I didn't see that in the article, but if he indeed said that... it makes me sad :(
My good friends, some who are coming over, and some who arent attending the dance, are all on my side and are trying to talk sense to some of the kids.
If it came down to it, and I were being tased into compliance, I'd rather die. I know for a fact that the cops wouldn't be charged with my death, but maybe, just maybe they'd kill themselves once the guilt sets in. We can only hope, right?
&gt;The fact that someone asking you out is any degree of creepy is why it sucks being a guy looking for a date. I must have misinterpreted this, then. My bad. I read it as you saying that girls like me are why it sucks to have to ask girls out, which doesn't make sense to me. In my eyes, if someone I've never even talked to wants to ask me out, they have no basis for knowing whether I'm interesting or not besides what I look like. Don't take me wrong, it's totally a compliment, but it just seems shallow to me and somewhat weird. 
Haven't even SEEN him play since he's been signed to us.  Total waste of funds.
Oh snap
A "computer" doesn't need to be a machine, and in fact the term was originally used as a profession. Perhaps "Computing Science" is a better name, but CE is certainly more focused on the machine and is not as generalized as CS.
[Bad joke](http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=toy%20story%202%20was%20okay)
hmm...somebody has caught on O.O
I didn't even know Gametrailers existed until this video. Huh.
That little "I'm afraid if I do something bad" feeling your conscience telling you that there are consequences to your actions.  Your parents did you well. Now, the reason why corporal punishment works well for children is because they ARE smart, and they need hard, fast boundaries and crossing them gets punishment.  Don't get me wrong HumanoidCarbonUnit.... I advocate corporal punishment, and I've used it in the case it's needed, but I'm not quick to spank.  I spank in severe cases of misbehavior.  When my boy was two, he kicked his favorite cat in the face and I spanked him. He never hurt an animal again.  When he was 6, he pulled his pants down in front of a couple of girls, because his friend told him it would be funny.  I made him walk down to their house, apologize and explain what he did, and why he knew it was wrong, and he never did anything like that again.   You have to pick your battles, and I can count on 1 hand how many times I've spanked my children in the last 10 years.  It MUST be an option though, just my opinion.
THIS!
For what?
Well that is better than having it in the kitchen. I would rather hobble a few meters with my pants around my ankles than across the house.
Fan fort is best fort.
No, I'm Spartacus!
That IS pretty clever.
I'm guessing his name isn't really "Jimmy"
If only this would spread throughout the entire US in the next 10 years... But it won't.
and i cannot lie
1: There's a place at the farm I used to live at that had this spot with trees and a lake that I loved and if I'm stressed I'll sit down and imagine I'm there...close enough? 2: All types. The metrosexual, the macho, the geek, the hipster, the suit etc. I have had both dominating, extroverted, down to earth etc. Literally all types in terms of personality and lifestyle.  3: Dominating men. They allways 'take' me. The wierd thing is if I fantasize about women (which happens ocasionally) I'm the one who take control.
[Here is a picture of where the bolt is located.](http://www.instructables.com/image/FMGG8JAFWYHVDR8/Locating-the-drain-plug.jpg)  Make sure to use **genuine** Honda ATF. 
the only planetarium left in Toronto is at the science centre, but i dont think its old school enough to have laser shows. 
yo, Tiger, imma let you finish, but please first admit it was Elin who beat your car window to death
And so you're back, from outer space
I don't think so.  It is the value that is of concern. For food or refreshments there is a $49.99 per single gift limit and $99.99 annual gifts limit.   Allowed:  "An item of little intrinsic value such as a greeting card or T-shirt."   Source:  http://www.sourcewatch.org/index.php?title=Congressional_gift_regulations#22._Food_or_refreshments_of_a_nominal_value_offered_other_than_as_part_of_a_meal.   See also:  http://ethics.senate.gov/downloads/pdffiles/new%20guidance%20under%20gifts%20rule.pdf
That's lag comp, not hit detection. Nothing wrong with that. Game would be unplayable without it.
Looks like your 504-thrower is fully functional, though.
i'm sorry, but the fact that nothing happens until 2:40 kinda ruins it for me
Ooh, cool, thanks! 
Add a code bounty system to your web site... the world is waiting for a good one.
I remind myself of this often, as does my employed SO. thanks for the reminder though : )
Reddit should not make me sleep only 5 hours, night-night.
Thats exactly what happened to me back in July. I know your pain.  http://i.imgur.com/KAbxM.jpg
best description I can give is the sensation of garlic but not the smell, and the smell of burned plastic and oxidized copper.  Very potent and burns the nose just a bit.
Most cows in north America are grain fed.  They necessarily eat much more grain then they produce in raw meat therefore by eating cows you are killing more nematodes then had you just eaten the grain.
DeVotchKa?
I pay off on the due date. Never been charged a late fee, and I don't put my money to work for someone else before I have to. This presumes a high enough credit limit to cover all expenses for the better part of two months.
It seems pretty routine for every Islamic sect to deny that every other Islamic sect is Islamic. And sometimes invoke the penalty for apostasy.
I would advise against anything by Steven Erikson.   He doesn't use any exposition at all, so you are left trying to figure out what is going on. When you think you have the slightest clue, he cuts away to a brand new set of characters on the other side of the world.   His writing is nice, yes, but I was so frustrated by his arrogance that I swore I would never read his work again.  Exposition is not a fucking trope.  Edit: Downvotes for disagreeing are for douchebags. Use your words!
What a handy chart. I'm suffering with 5 &amp; 6 almost perpetually. 2-3 seem ideal for me. Really, as long as it comes out and doesn't smear, making it extremely difficult to clean (And often "leaving some" up in there after I'm done.) then I'd be happy. Softer stool usually doesn't cooperate like that.  I'll have to give that a try, maybe. I'll ask a doctor what he thinks.
Ultramon is great for dual monitor setups, try it out
JIMMY NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!
It is calculated when GDP calculations are done which measures the value added by US companies. IE If they spend 10 dollars on stuff from China and sell the product for 30 dollars it will count for 20.   How its actually measured gets really complicated and boring fast if your interested BEA has this:  http://www.bea.gov/national/pdf/nipa_primer.pdf
The other day? Whoa whoa there...who asked for specifics!
You implied ramifications, What would that be besides a compromised console?
always coming into work loaded...
Like, really, really, ridiculously good looking.
Elaborate?
I've been trying my best to answer this question as well as possible.  I sometimes find it hard to recognize large changes in myself until I have more time to look back and see the contrast a bit better.  I feel better able to deal with hardships in my life for one thing. I have a better set of personal tools at my disposal to deal with things as they come to me. I'm better at assigning a hierarchy of importance for everything and dealing with issues in a more constructive way. At the same time, I'm much better at realizing when I have no control over a situation and I can relax much more easily when this is the case.  It's liberating when you know you can't do something so you just stop trying to alter the unalterable.  As a bonus side-effect, I've become slightly less capable of dealing with what I consider "Trivial" issues my friends go through. This probably makes me seem like more of a dick then I did before, but my perspective is so different now that little things really don't matter to me and I have a harder time empathizing with less life-altering things.  I'm sure this will balance out in the future, but some "drama" just doesn't matter to me anymore.
I don't want to blame it ALL on Brendon Fevola, but....
You're invited.
I would if it was like [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=C1nxaQhsaaw)
SO MUCH MEANING! SO MUCH DEPTH!
That's a pot of comedy gold right there.
This doesn't make sense.  UFC has online streaming now.  The only reason the Japanese market wouldn't get into UFC is because they aren't tech savvy enough (fat chance) or they just don't want to watch UFC fights.
"Deception Point" was good, so was "Digital Fortress" and "Angels and Demons".  "Da Vinci Code" was a pretty good read.  I didn't care for "The Lost Symbol" all that much.  Do you actually dislike Dan Brown, or is that just the cool thing to say right now because he's popular?  I bet you REALLY hate Dane Cook too, am I right?
While the concept of questioning science is generally good, there would need to be a whole class around critical thinking and the philosophy of science for it to be meaningful. Otherwise it would just turn into "Herp, derp, scientists aren't 100% sure so I don't have to listen to them" from a lot of the students.  Of course this bill does not have any of these noble ideals and is merely the latest attempt by Conservative Christians to undermine science that opposes their ideology. For this reason the bill should be opposed.
Don't forget [Lancelot Link](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WV9Y0Qy0U20).
payment is still an issue, They won't/wouldn't accept my Canadian credit card even though VISA, AMEX and Mastercard work the same in both Countries. (May have changed since around 2005 when I last tried.)
NO THIS CANT BE. FUCK YOU. I'LL RUB YOUR BACK IF YOU FIX IT. I'VE LED A MEANINGLESS LIFE. FUCK IT, AT LEAST NOW I DON'T HAVE TO READ "DAE REMEMBER EGYPT" POSTS NEXT WEEK. 
i use LyX (latex editor) and sometimes have silence and sometimes play music, usually techno metal or something like that. even though thats not what i typically listen to, it serves well for doing mathematics.
Self posts only. Please see the guidelines to the right. 
Really? That movie felt so bland to me. There were some really great moments both comedic and otherwise but on the whole it just felt like it was missing something. 
I read this too and thought joints... clearly the guys at nymag are smoking some fat ass blunts. 
"Whenever I see an old lady slip and fall on a wet sidewalk, my first instinct is to laugh. But then I think, what if I was an ant, and she fell on me. Then it wouldn't seem quite so funny." -Jack Handey
Ah yes, the reed: the cruelest of all the marsh grasses.
there's many ways to time it out, but I always had great results doing it the way K0ll timed it out and never wanted to feel what it was like to comedown from rolling while still feeling the acid pretty hard.
I do my best to keep him happy and he doesn't disappoint me either! ;)
I just realized this guy would be the perfect guy to play Nathan Drake for an Uncharted Movie. Theyre pretty much the exact same person.
That name is completely random!
&gt;Do you really think a democratic Saudi Arabia would choose to attack Israel, knowing that it has nukes and could simply end Mecca and Medina?  Saudi Arabia teaches and exports a really *special* brand of crazy.
you and SPTS need to find a room together.
Againts Terran and Zerg I macroed like crazy but againts Toss I just lost to 4-gate always. 
A Canadian would sell his mother for the kind of bandwidth you so callously wasted with that comment. 
You mean carbonated beverages.
I am seeing another hand.
&gt;You tell me why I need a capo. Name songs for which it is essential. I've always just been able to transpose.  This is not a proper question. It is a demand and is perceived as aggressive, which makes others less receptive towards you.
no way dude, that third one is legit!  sorry!
It's solid as a rock!
You're all set up. If you go in while she's working (I don't think she works the rest of the week cause of exams) she's under orders to give you a cupcake. Rock on.
I don't eat meat because I don't like the taste, texture of biting into it and knowing where it came from. That being said, I think I would rather continue being vegetarian.  
monsters inc?
have you had sex while stoned? this was a real game changer for me and my gf
Somebody got shit in their breakfast this morning.
It's short one neck for that.
That's wicked cool!
because the CRTC bitchslapped all the Canadiens
Making my own exercises seems so *meta*, though.   [Something like this](http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/0786617918/ref=oss_product) but 400 pages, in the bass clef, and full of brainless Bass Fitness-esque exercises.   Sigh.
There,s an app for that. Al_Jezeera  English 
http://imgur.com/EKXaV  That's my female character from Lord of the Rings online in her current setup. No cleavage, so I'm pretty pleased. She actually looks like she's going to battle and not to the beach. 
Yeah, basically. I guess I should have prefaced my post by saying that a small flat rate and a reasonable usage charge would be totally cool with me. Also it sucks that people are downvoting your original comment.
My head grew heavy and my sight grew dim I had to stop for the night
Yes, you see some real insights on r/economics.  "Yeah, well, I bet China's productivity is a lot lower than that of the U.S.  So suck on that Americans!"  --  Ed:  I forgot to add [goes on to become top rated comment.]
good, now I just need someone to engineer  a $12 sun and I'm all set.
Yes. Though they're Classics, Chuck Taylors are far too often recommended. There are similiar options (i.e. PF Flyers) that add a bit more personality to the user than the, "Welp here's a generic casual guy!" look Chuck Taylors are synonymous with. There's a reason that cartoon character children often are seen wearing that style... 
But you know exactly what you're getting and you have a warranty on each part, and you don't have to "deal" with 15 different companies when ONE thing breaks, btw.  Buying stuff from Gateway, Dell, etc you get cheap-ass no-name parts or rebranded parts with proprietary drivers... it's a pain in the ass to deal with them when something breaks.
[Greed, on the other hand...](http://topnews.net.nz/images/Wall-St-23.jpg)
the obvious and unnecessary UNC dig there would be funny if UNC didn't play their best basketball of the year (still not great) in the NIT.  that UNC team could've beat that Duke team on Sunday.
sooo...everyone from hollywood? (;
&gt;The first sign of wrongness is knowingly misinterpreting what your compatriot is saying.  First of all: [He used this as an argument.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thought-terminating_clich%C3%A9#Thought-terminating_clich.C3.A9) This is not misinterpretation, it's making his fallacy obvious.  Secondly: You are pathetic. What you just claimed is simply wrong as a justifiably condescending tone from my side in no way reflects on the validity of my arguments.  Your provocation through that ridiculous ad hominem attack is quite pathetic but ultimately redundant.  The *ultimate* sign of wrongness is not providing argumentation but trying to poison the well so you can self-validate yourself. Enjoy your cognitive dissonance, I don't really care about your education.
Yes, but what will any of you do about it?
That's cool. I hope you found who you're looking for.
This is a stupid comparison.  -Australia is a much less densely populated country, which means providing access is a lot more difficult to do and a hell of a lot more expensive.  -A much larger % of our traffic comes from overseas when compared to the US/Europe. International traffic is expensive and cannot be offered at unlimited amounts for a low price.  -AAPT are a tier 1 carrier and were unable to sustain the unlimited broadband plans themselves, how is a tier 2/3 ISP going to manage it?
People suffering from an addiction *are* being told to do something.  Selling addictive substances should be considered coercion.
This is a top secret clip that was extracted from one of the Jesus Camp children.  You see, before the children are allowed to enter Jesus Camp, they have O.R.C.'s (Optical Reception Chips) installed in their cerebral cortex so the leaders can extract what the children are actually seeing.  [This child](http://www.fasthack.com/images/weblog/2006/09/jesuscamp.jpg) was an up-and-comer, and to the other children, he looked like a velociraptor, and when he spoke, the children spoke in tongues while weeping in a self-induced rave.  He was the chosen one.  He was becoming Philosoraptor.
Without going into detail(unless you want), does EG pay a salary and if so is it comparable to a typical 9-5?
Interesting to note that all three races have underpowered/overpowered as results, but Terran has "imbalanced", zerg has "hard" and protoss has "easy"
Tonight is my first class and I'm bringing in various weights and types of yarn, different types of needles, etc. to show my students.  I also tend to mention tension as we go along because beginners usually knit EXTREMELY tight. Gauge is the only thing I really have trouble teaching because I'm absolutely horrible at it myself (although i do tell them that usually people knit up swatches and measure them haha).  I have never knit a hat that fits right for this reason.  I also have never blocked anything in my life.  I feel bad for teaching them "bad" knitting practice... maybe I'll start doing those things and have them down before we get to that point in the class. Thanks so much for these suggestions! 
&gt;why should anyone be forced to buy insurance?  Because at some point everyone gets sick through little fault of their own.  You can either choose to have the insured pay for the uninsured, or you can set up a system where everyone pays in equally. Personally, I'd prefer a national healthcare system, but I can understand the need for a mandate if this country is still going to cling to its broken private insurance system.
Whilst I don't like the idea of killing dogs, the company did try to get them adopted/give them away first. Sure its a bad thing, but it wasn't like the dogs were killed for pleasure, they were killed because there wasn't a better option (upkeep for a dog =$ , putting down a dog is better than letting it starve)
SCARY GOD DAMN PHOTO I HAVE EVER SEEN ON REDDIT, AND I'VE BEEN TO THE DEAD KIDS SUBREBBIT.
So I wrote out a super awesome response, I mentioned public education, food pyramid and what not, then realized that your response didn't merit the effort.  Obviously we have a difference of opinion and we can leave it at that, I believe we should be responsible for ourselves, you seem to believe someone else should take care of that for us, to each there own.
What kind of things other than being a progamer or caster would you recommend to those who want to get into the esports scene?
Good article, upvoted. KEEP UP THE GOOD FIGHT!
Your father taught you well, because every young child should learn self defense. We are human beings, and protecting ourselves from a danger reasonably is a given. My dad taught me how to box, and though I only had to use it once, it gave me a sense of "let's make it happen" self esteem that made bullies avoid me (because they tend to pick on people who are scared and timid). If I have kids in the future, I'm going to teach them the sweet science as soon as possible.
I know, but i replaced the whole port board instead of messing around with solder. The boards seem to be around £20 for most laptops but for the Inspiron 1545 the cheapest I could find was £50 (they're still the same price today). At the time it was only 6 months old so parts were harder to find too.
I practice as much as i can, when i can find Good practice.. I'm not a fan of 24/7 ladder 60 games a day style.. becasue I dont find i get alot out of it. Somtimes it gets hard to balance things specialy with a girl friend that im crazy about. But at the end of the day I always seem to find a way to make things work :)  Yes i played brood war I went to WCG USA National finals 2006 2007 2009 (Finished top 4)
It's true.
So the detractors are a "hivemind" because they don't share your opinion that *everybody* has to be somewhat of a fan.  TL;DR I like Smith's movies fine, but your hypocritical post makes you look like a reddouche.
they have McDonalds
You can't figure out the private key just from the challenge/response unless you mount a chosen-plaintext attack, but I'm guessing that's a bit beyond his abilities (or he'd be WAY rich). I also didn't see the definition of "break" in that context, which would elucidate things.
Being forced to buy insurance is being forced to buy insurance.  Whether the object is to protect the mortgage holder, other drivers, or society to cover my health costs, it is still mandating me to buy the product.  
god damn.
Wrong. The DLC will be exclusive to the gamertag; even if multiple tags are on one console. 
It's not what is on your hard drive, it's what IP address that the ISP has associated with the account downloaded. Every PC connected to that internet connection has the same IP address to the internet and the router the PCs are hooked up to determines which PC is requesting the data and routes it to that PC.  All I can say is if you are really worried about it stop downloading pirated things on other people's connections. :P It's the only way to be 100% sure nothing bad happens to whoever is paying for the 'linksys' connection. ;)
More info can be found [here](http://www.cloudnet.com/~djohnson/records.htm). Just do a search for the term "folded".
We're forced to pay income taxes, buy auto insurance, and more.  I guess that's unconstitutional too?  Maybe emergency rooms should just turn away people without health insurance, and let them die?  Too bad one judge doesn't have the power to repeal "obamacare".
It had its moments, but yeah, there was a reason they didn't make a second season
South Park?
To make things really complicated:   What about bands that have real people's names in them, like "The Alan Parsons Project"? Should they be   * Alan Parsons Project, The * Parsons Project, Alan, The * Parsons, Alan, Project, The  In the meantime, I'll be over here, trying to figure out where Led Zeppelin's fourth album goes alphabetically...
I work in a public school. There is no money teaching in a private school. The people I work with wanted to be teachers. There are people who WANT to teach. We're obviously a little nuts, but there it is.
liberal or Liberal?  The first means open and accepting, the second means (in American political vernacular) Democratic or Green voters.  You probably won't find many intelligent illiberal people, or so I might hope, but you can probably find some non-Liberal folks who are pretty smart.  Now, here's the rub - "Liberal" isn't anything close to a leftist position in the real world. Most Democratic voters in the USA are middle-right to far-right in their beliefs. There is no real left in this country, and that is unlikely to change as long as America is the center of a global empire and must act in a manner completely antithetical to liberal/leftist values. As a simple matter of survival, America cannot afford an organized left.  But I digress... You're looking for a bunch of non-mouth-breathing Conservatives (note the big C) with whom to have a decent discussion.  I have no answers for you there - such a place might exist, but I've never even gone looking. I think intelligence and Conservative values are damn-near incompatible these days. Perhaps back in Buckley's lifetime it was possible to have a working brain and also be a Conservative, but I've been disgusted with those folks for at least as long as I've viewed the Liberals as a bunch of whinging cowards and appeasers.  Best luck.
Also I probably should have said "is actually decent" rather than "who are actually decent" I R GOOD GRAMMAR
Who wants to watch a horse eat barley and oats? 
Honestly, your best bet for survival is a tall building, downtown. I'd probably pick some kind of hotel because they would be vacant during a national crisis. There would also be endless supplies thanks to the hotel's kitchen and minibars. Unlike a mall, hotels aren't completely open, and there's usually only one set of main doors. (Usually revolving doors that you can just jam with a bunch of shit) Weapons would probably be a problem... Besides that, my plan is fool proof. Even if the front doors were broken down, those fucking idiot zombies would never be able to operate an elevator and find what floor I'm on.   I'd only bring 1-2 other people, so I could easily kill them if they got infected.
Yeah it gets plenty of traffic. :) The other thing you could do it link it to an Amazon page, to get spare cash on the side. :p
Personal realization requires that we understand the importance of removing ourselves as much as possible from the influence of the political and financial establishment.
Farmville and Zynga Poker
Thank you for linking to this. The 2-ch link will probably expire eventually anyway. I would have linked directly to the source if I had known but there is no tineye for .swf files and I only know the russian that google can translate for me. Seriously, thanks :)
Paracetamol = bad drug - massive liver toxicity, easy to overdoes, quite ineffective THC = good drug - No toxicity, no known overdose, very effective  Am I doing this right?
fixed
It's not bad acting, it's not over-acting. It's "[mega-acting](http://outlawvern.com/tag/mega-acting/)."
Little did they know, they were in for an excruciating death in stomach acid.
Likewise.  All this did was tie up a handicapped space
It's one thing to have advanced military hardware.  It's entirely different to know how to use it effectively.  
At least we're taxing them ...  .. right?
Can you explain the situation?
Terrestrial is on Earth. Extra-terrestrial is off Earth.
don't taunt man. we've been running these tests for more than a year. hoping this will be the one
"No hard feelings, but we hate you for existing."  Nice move there. Perhaps they could extend this streak by openly expressing their dislike of various ethnic and religious minorities as well, after all they don't want to be known for just the one thing.
But doesn't that only apply to those who actually work for reddit/Conde Nast?
[](/melvin) Technically you should have capitalised each letter in order to achieve the intended meme effect.
How can a doll be racist? Dolls dont talk, you are silly. Unless of course - do you hear her voice in your head?
Have an outrageous story planned to explain your scars, actually have several. Any time a girl asks about a scar I make a concerted effort to concoct the most absurd story I can think of.  My favorite to date is, "Ninjas."
Known in the biz as a [camera toss](http://www.flickr.com/groups/cameratoss/pool/). I took [this less impressive one](http://www.flickr.com/photos/garyfixler/42565941/) of an old CRT TV and LCD monitor. The monitor doesn't refresh the way a CRT does, so it looks like a white blur. The TV screen frames are warped because of the TV's redraw rate.
Remember what it was like before you were born?  That.
That miss me yet billboard was also put up in Burnsville.. it was graffitied the next day. The south burbs don't mess around. 
Big frown on my face when she said she usually only plays single player. That's a totally different experience than coming back again and again to climb the ladder.
They likely did that so they could win votes for helping healthcare, while virtually guaranteeing that it would fail.  Win votes, keep corporate financial backers.
If you can't honestly tell her that the reason everyone can tell them apart is because she weighs 20lb more than her sister, then your relationship needs a little work.
If it's not just "This person I'm not attracted to is hitting on me," I'd suggest looking deeper at my motivations and feelings.
First of all it wouldn't be a piece of shit because its a macbook pro so it still has some processing power. What's the harm in trying? If I could get it back I could at least sell it and get a little extra cash because I could definitely use it right now. And by the way I also have a custom built desktop running Windows 7 and Ubuntu. Not a fanboi.
It's just what I like to listen to. It's not like I actively choose to only like metal
For what?
I get turned into diamonds. Pretty cool if you ask me!
Think he came back early too because of an injury on the moose.
Are you saying you should of been aborted?
There are other dangers. For example:  &gt; The tragedy unfolded as Arabell Lin, 25, who had a prosthetic right leg, was walking between the cars of a subway train on March 28. After she fell, she hit a device on one of the cars that triggers the emergency brake when the train encounters an obstruction.  So obviously you better be careful walking between cars.
Don't hit boxes or rails wearing a backpack! It'll screw up your balance.
I had a couple, but nothing very serious. I would have to be retarded to stop dating entirely because I found a girl that was not interested in dating me. You suck it up, appreciate that you have a cool chick for a friend, and move on.  It just worked out that after a few years of being friends, she got to a point where she wanted to try dating again, I was single and still interested, and so we got together. 
kansas, yo what about yourself?
Or Unstoppable 2.
Because of the pedants?  Okay, I'll admit that in this case it was actually quite funny.
I'm almost certain they were for Reservoir Dogs, I think Kevin said it.  But then again, they could have just been colors.
k. not much i can tell you but i'll try. 
I didn't like it that much.  I really liked the first album for the most part, but this track just doesn't feel right, especially lyrically.
Which episode? I want to know what he's responding to.
I'm fairly certain that you cannot do this. As I recall, Health Canada grows all medical marijuana itself at a facility in Manitoba. I could be wrong, though - that's just a half-remembered Discovery Channel documentary I'm recalling. 
this is not at all surprising in the city that made CLOUT a verb!
It's a term commonly used to denote an internship, but usually for a longer period of time (6-8 months).
Obviously so!
those are great pictures! so sexy.
Modern games are GPU capped in terms of FPS. Look up any number of hardware reviews on Anandtech, HardOCP, Tomshardware, Extremetech, etc and you'll see this is true. Very few games have their FPS bound by the CPU at the highest graphical settings - only Supreme Commander comes to mind. And your example, WoW, isn't exactly known for its graphically stunning environment.  While it IS true that CPU matters up to a certain point, saying that "the primary component of your PC that determines your FPS is your processor" is just clearly bullshit.
You spent 10 minutes looking at diving compilations you complete spack, of course they're going to be clear cut in slow mo camera.  Be the ref in a game and with imperfect information or vision, with players going down at slight contact and you've got a problem.  I've been a ref, it's not a fucking easy job.
The latter 3, frankly.
Look, a state that claims to base its laws on religious law, and which is legally interested in the religious beliefs of its citizens cannot be considered secular. Mubarak may ignore religion in most aspects of governance, but as soon as the government mentions religion, it has compromised its secular nature.
Q: How can you tell if someone's a jerk?   A: They keep offering you animal products to eat every fifteen minutes when you've already told them you're a vegan and then act as if they should be the ones offended. 
EvE doesn't work like other MMOs (no "gear" resets) so you account will still be very relevant and pretty much as good as you left it so you should reactivate it.  Also, if you invested any points into the learning skills you will have had them refunded since that skillgroup were removed and you will be able to assign them to any skills of your choice.
No he doesn't ಥ_ಥ
Thanks for the response. I knew I wasn't the first, only, or last person to be going through this. I just needed to let it out.  I don't doubt that I will have regrets if I break up with her in the future. She is amazing and we have known each other since we were little kids. I guess part of me tells me that I need to see what else is out there to know if *anyone* I date is "the one".  But this isn't fair to her - she'll be waiting for me to come back and what if I don't? We've talked about this scenario before and she tells me that she wouldn't date anyone else. I feel as if it's not just me that needs to "get out" - it's in her own benefit too to get more experience in before being so committed to someone.  Blugh.
So jealous, sitting in my chair at work. Sounds like you had an awesome time!
I'll be honest with you. I don't know what I'd be more scared of. The zombies running around in a zombie apocalypse. Or a girl with mommy issues running around in a zombie apocalypse with a melon-baller in each hand.
I might have to verify if your real by licking your pussy clean....
Awesome, thank you!
prob round a four bro
I've never had uncapped internet, in 12 years.  And plans here state "up to (x) Mbps", but I've only ever gotten 1Mbps max, on any plan. And I live just outside of Toronto.
My game plays got much better after I found this out. I thought the "robin hood" goblin archer was the toughest opponent before knowing this.
Funny and sad thing is, so did I :(
And one of them includes an almost extortionate way of trying to get businesses to pay for a spotless record. BBB has absolutely no accountability whatsoever and compromise their reliability by their actions towards businesses.  While I personally love the *idea* behind the BBB, as someone that has managed small businesses before and know many such people like myself, I have become incredibly disillusioned to the point that I veer away from companies that make a point of telling you about their BBB rating when they do it so people feel more comfortable with them over a competitor. And I'm not one of those people that had a million complaints, I only had one in the past several years and it was resolved to the satisfaction of everyone in a single business day (said person that filed the complaint is a repeat customer to this day...), yet the BBB's very first action was to tell me to buy a membership to resolve this problem in a fairly threatening manner and then dragged everything on longer than necessary. I know others that have had the same problem, and some that even gave in and paid up because they thought that a customer with a frivolous complaint just wouldn't budge. (And well, even when we're all customers somewhere, if you've ever sold a product/services, you know what I mean about certain customers...)  I wish they'd stick with letting consumers know about scams and best practices, not this shady thing they have going on with business ratings. I wish they'd scrap the ratings altogether. I don't really see an easy way for BBB to stay neutral and still ask for money from the same businesses they rate. There are many services BBB can provide to businesses that aren't ratings that they could charge for.
Just...no.
Can you please describe your college experience so far? I am hoping to do exactly what you are doing, but like you was wondering about the opportunities I'd have in the Air Force or Army.
A comedy heavily involving the occult. friends who hate how their lives have turned out and decide to raise some kind of demonic spirit who turns out to be a sarcastic asshole
I think in the context of the response he was talking about it emotionally (I know that's what I said in my email). That being said, I don't think he would preclude the possibility of there being great music that stimulates intellectual thought. I know I'm like that with Stravinsky's Rite of Spring.
Haven't seen it. I guess it's unfair to criticize Spanish TV so much. There are good programs. I just saw an episode of Museo Coco, I think it was called, that was hilarious. It just seems like whenever I turn it on  it is talk shows or whatever the Big Brother ripoff is called.
* Nick Drake - [Place to Be](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9IUqN9ozmhw), [Northern Sky](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=y11X5WljnFA), [Black Eyed Dog](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NXAzXUrfLFw), among others. Seriously, my favourite artist.  * Ennio Morricone's score for The Good, The Bad and The Ugly. * Sigur Ros - [Festival](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WWMDfJEkQDs). * Vangelis - [Blade Runner Blues](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5SJVP4YAybs). * Johann Strauss II - [The Blue Danube Waltz](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VTqlLKBKFhg). * Aaron Copland - [Very Slowly](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9IFY1DN-qM4), from Appalachian Spring. * Claude Debussy - [Clair de Lune](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CvFH_6DNRCY) and [La fille aux cheveux de lin](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vXonKW9WU2w). * Gustav Holst - [Saturn, the Bringer of Old Age](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vLa-pYzdAQM), from The Planets.  I'm sure I'll think of more later.
I had Peter singer speak this year at my school. He is such an amazing speaker/ethicist. 
&gt;I didn't say trolling was state socialist.  Popeguilty asks "what's states socialist about rancom?" You respond by talking about me trolling. That sounds like you saying trolling is state socialist. If not, then what is the connection that leads you to bring up trolling?  As for idiocy, could someone please explain to me what is idiotic about actually believing that it is possible for words to have meanings? I really don't get the anarchyist opposition to semantic content.
If that's a typical room in Japan, that's where I want to live.
well, to program it, you can probably just power the device off of the ftdi directly.   Otherwise, if you want to leave the 9v -&gt; 5v source hooked up, you should be able to program the device off of the ftdi as long as the ground of the ftdi and the ground of the atmel part are connected. 
I think this warrants a tldr
This is the funniest thing I've seen this year! XD
You don't have to own a car or own a home. This is like saying we all have to buy auto insurance,  even if we don't drive. This is required for everyone. People don't understand. You don't get free healthcare with this law. You simply are mandated to buy health insurance, even if you have a preexisting condition. Sure, the insurance companies are required to insure you, but will you be able to afford it? Probably not. Now you just pay the fine and remain uninsured. Its totally fucked. 
It's trying to not hurt my feelings :(
I have built two bikes up from scratch.  The experience makes later maintenance easy.  I would recommend searching out a bike co-op in your area that has tools and volunteer techs to help you put it together on the cheap.  
Query:  How willfully stupid does someone have to be before others can legitimately point it out in frustration?
You may not have any context on this, but, is the regional work schedule more hectic? 
Thanks, man :\
I wish I could stop eating there but their food and eating environment is so much better than their competition.
At least you admit it lol. People agree with me but won't post experiences! :P
One of the best shows I've ever been to:  http://www.flickr.com/photos/michaelalangoldberg/2951279577/in/set-72157608152809935/
Who cares what he thinks? All the political upheaval we see going on in the world can be traced directly back to his reign. I'm still waiting for him to be dragged before a world tribunal. Perhaps the recent unrest might speed that along. I just hope it happens before Cheney croaks, as he deserves a prison sentence even more than the idiot boy.
This is exactly how I feel...Cause when you think about it. The reason to wear those bras are A) to get some sexy time, then when you take em off the guy/girl is like...where the fuck did they go... B) too make yourself prettier..But you'll never be truly pretty if you're not being yourself.  The whole market is centered around the insecurities of women in today's society where big boobs are the only thing to make someone pretty. and I used to be in that group of people...but then I realized my 34Bs are sexy and if they don't like em, they can't have em. (:  BTW leave the prick...&gt;.&gt;
during times of tragedy, the strip club always cheers me up.
Keep in mind that this also takes into account your sov level.  The new TCU is only sov level 0 so it won't make much difference for a couple of days.  At least on this map.
Then Ibogaine. There all better.
C-C-C-COMB....eh fuck it
i want one :(
I find sewing to be a very helpful skill actually. My flatmate is an extremely competent seamstress and she's helped me brush up my basic sewing skills (hurrah for sexist high schools teaching me sewing) to the point where I have made myself a couple of dresses which are much more to my individual taste than anything I've found in the stores. 
Mass Effect 2
I automatically read this in the robot voice.
THE best ever!  ...aaaaannd now I'm hungry.
What not to bring: &gt;Video games [...] that contain graphic blood or gore, sensual or demonic themes, violent first-person shooting  Staying in the residence halls: &gt;All weapons brought to campus must be turned in for storage. Trigger locks are required for pistols.  ಠ_ಠ
I used to work in a sex toy shop and helped a lot of guys in your situation.   My advice: Do not get her anything without her there helping you pick it out. Most places that sell sex toys have a "no returns, EVER" policy, and you always get what you pay for as far as vibrators go, so you don't want to make a potentially expensive mistake. I know you want to surprise her, but seriously, when vibrators are involved, the last thing you want is a surprise. Have her browse things online with you, and have her pick out a few options. Then maybe you can surprise her with one of the ones she chose.   A few things to consider:   --insertable or no? The Magic Wand is great, but if she wants something she can be penetrated with, you'll have to buy extra attachments for that.   --plug-in or battery-powered? Do you really want to be tied to an electrical outlet during superhappyfuntime? Also keep in mind that the plug-in models tend to be louder and more intense. Or are you going to use this so much that you should be buying batteries in bulk at Costco?  --have a measuring tape with you when you are browsing online, so that that you know *exactly* what size you are looking at. Again, you really don't want any surprises here.   --**You get what you pay for**. I mentioned it before. But yeah, now is not a time to cheap out. That doesn't mean you have to pay $150 for the ultra-fancy, doeseverythingbutcookyoubreakfast model, but don't buy the El Cheapo $15 model. A good vibrator that lasts will cost you about $50 without discounts. Anything else will not last longer than the batteries.   The Magic Wand is pretty intense, but the vibrations can be diffused with attachments. If you do decide to go that route, make sure you get high quality attachments that are washable silicone, and are specifically made for the Magic Wand. The cheaper ones will disintegrate and/or not fit properly.   If you want discreet shipping, order from Good Vibrations. They also have a [great article about buying your first vibrator](http://www.goodvibes.com/content.jhtml?id=my-first-vibrator), as well as ratings for volume and intensity for all the vibes they sell. The user reviews are helpful too. Whatever you do, do not order from Adam &amp; Eve. I know they get plugged on various podcasts and have awesome discounts and stuff, however, they are anything but discreet. Your vibrator will come in a plain box, but every week after that they'll send you catalogs in envelopes with porn DVD covers plastered all over them, announcing to anyone who sees your mail that YOU ARE A VALUED ADAM &amp; EVE CUSTOMER. Believe me, I know from experience.   If nothing else, involve her in the selection process. I've seen many a well-meaning guy get all excited about presenting his girlfriend with a brand-new vibrator, only to come back the next day with a sad face that got even sadder when I told him that there were no returns, EVER. Don't be that guy. 
YOU BASTARD! DIE IRL!!1ONE!
&gt;It's like having Oprah making strategic decisions on warfare attacks.
No matter how you spin it, the US Government is involved. It is our money that arm their police and soldiers. It is our money that props up the government. You cannot say that we should not get involved in a situation we are already helplessly involved in. Threaten to remove $2 Billion in "aid" seems like an adequate response.
In my eyes, the question "Does god exist?" is the same as "Is the universe, as a whole, conscious?". I can't answer either question because I have nothing to go from, no reference point. I only have my own consciousness. I can hardly prove other *humans* are conscious, much less the universe as a whole. Therefore I'm Atheist Agnostic. 
Yes, remove the fuse.  By the way, I'm a Master Tech. Please take my advise seriously. Electrical fires in cars are almost impossible to put out. Be safe.
You know what to do. Just fucking do it. Don't worry about consequences and what not. It will all be okay. (Disclaimer: I'm so drunk right now, but what I say is true.)
&gt;Your mother probably knows that he is seeing other women and is fine with it.   Lol...where the hell is this coming from? There is no basis for this in the information that we were given.   &gt;Not all married couples are monogamous, most of the polyamorous ones hide their polyamory from their children, friends and family.  But most are. 
In desperation or even a lapse in sanity I tried the microwavable pork rinds. They weren't half bad if it wasn't for the fact they had the texture of packing peanuts. 
your damn right nobody will agree with you that movie was hilarious the first time i saw it in a theater
I won't have to worry about having to think about what would happen, anymore.
Sarcasm aside, Valve had better grenade physics in Half Life 2....
Not again, FFS.
And I'd like to take a minute, just sittin' right here...
I don't know. It was just the quote from The Mask.
okay. delete this whole post and start over. it's a good cause and I think you can get support. try posting in another subreddit, maybe education. maybe change the title even?   my other teacher friends have actually got flip cameras and other technology through donorschoose.org, so it does actually work. do the link inside the text option and tell a story that will draw the reader in. when you just click on the link, it's not much there, and I didn't even want to stay. i'd include why she's asking for them also and what she's using them for. i know it's probably already in the website link, but you need to get reddit upfront. good luck!
Duh, that's what underground hip hop and rap is for.
glad to have turned someone onto squarepusher
Your relationship will never be the same again.
It IS just a word, and my genderqueer friends and I call one another faggots as a term of endearment [think "nigger" in modern black vernacular], but you can't just throw that shit around indiscriminately.
That scene was the single greatest moment of my child hood.  God damn Vannilla Ice and the tmnt all in one scene.
Fuckin' Kiwis.
They are quite annoying especially if the logs are too random so you have to move a dirt tree multiple times for ONE tree. I hate these and you can't burn them down since, uh ho, logs burn forever if it's the top one..
I'll connect my peepee into your pooper
thanks captain.
Even better! Those inhibitions are lowered much faster that way!
I fucking hate Dell support, they simply didn't reply to requests to fix a WARRANTY repair on a netbook of theirs within warranty period.  Even after one of their guys from Twitter got involved, fuck all happened.  Eventually replaced the LCD myself with on from ebay.  Fuck that and it's 30 fucking screws.
The twirling came from another report.
Where do you live that the only people who qualify as "men" have long hair and full beards? Do you hear banjos, perchance?  edit: to respond to your clarification, I would argue that very few *people* look the way people once looked. We don't see people walking around with powdered wigs or swords strapped to them anymore, do we? Times change.
My thought was that it was a competing Thai massage operation.
It's ridiculous if true, but I have pretty serious doubts. I work for Whole Foods, and it's basically impossible to get fired there. We had a guy who works in the kitchen show up in a swastika t-shirt and they just made him turn the shirt inside-out. I honestly can't imagine them firing someone over something like this, unless they'd been looking for an excuse for a long time.
Wow! Any one of these is fine. Lets choose the route with the most food options. I get the drunk munchies!
And like arseholes we are perfectly entitled to voice them on reddit.   Feel free to make a post telling us how much you love him and fantasise about wanking him off while he tells you stories about how lukki copies his drops. "oh skirillex, you sound is so.... Well, not dirty, but kinda flaccid and mainstream. Play me some more mediocre loops while jumping around franticly twiddling knobs on your desk pretending you have done more than just press play on your MacBook. Can I try on your glasses? They are so pretentious!". 
I once setup up a three day adventure that gave amazing treasure and magic items. At the end, just as the completed killing the bad guy, they each awoke in their bedroll, realizing the entire thing was a shared dream.
yeah, the original robin became Nightwing and all that.
its still more likely than the bible
Like I say..., don't "RUSH" to judgement. You are acting like all Muslims are terrorists. This is not the case and it's not the case with Muslim Brotherhood.
Do you write for a living? This is great, I could picture everything, laughing my ass off the whole time, sorry. Do you two still talk about it, or is one of those things never metioned?
I love how many people are complaining that it's childish and immature, or that there's not a dollar bill above $100.  That's not the point!  It's about how greed can turn you blind and if you think it's stupid, well, I feel sorry for you.
what? what are you replying to?
[Nikon still make the F6 and FM10](http://www.nikonusa.com/Nikon-Products/Film-Cameras/index.page).  (The F6 is the most advanced 35mm SLR ever - although not the most powerful, that was the F5.)
Gumbercules?! I love that guy!
Your only hope is to whip your head around to cover the immediate area with as much blood as possible and then blow as hard as you can into a dog whistle.
How do you safely get lair tech in time to scout 4-gate or cloaked 'shees? Honest question, because I don't give a damn about balance since I'm not top 100.
"If you have nothing to die for, than you have nothing to live for" - MLK or  "Success builds character, failure reveals it" - Dave Checketts
To take some sting out of the wound, you do get exp from sharing crates so it isn't like you aren't getting anything out of it.  Plus when it comes down to it, I'd rather have a team mate get the package than an enemy.  So I guess it all depends on the situation.
are these all you or do you have a band? 
I agree. 
Tara Reid.
Rage comic is the new Xanga.
And that's why you always leave a note.
Supernatural elements? What happened to naturalistic sci fi?
black history month
I'm trying really hard to find the study that I read this in but I can't at the moment.  It showed that organic food was many times better for the environment than non-organic veggies, which was in turn better for the environment than meat.
BRB, steak for dinner.
5. Adding to the anti-/r/politics circlejerk that is the current iteration of /r/libertarian
What's your favorite match ever played?  What's your favorite cast of a match you played? (do you watch these casts?)  Who would/do you like to play against in a tournament final?   Good luck tonight!
**Hash House a Go Go** for a breakfast you will not soon forget.  Eat here and you will rescind your recommendation for Black Bear.  **Lucille's** at Green Valley Ranch for the Best BBQ I know of in Vegas.  Also the best fried pickles I have ever had anywhere, including the Texas State Fair.  **Mr. Lucky's** at the Hard Rock Hotel is a great spot for a late night stop..  Steak, shrimp, mashed potatoes and salad for $7.77, called the "Mr. Lucky's Special".  **Del Frisco's** for steak, although the Morton's on Flamingo is a close second.  That Mortons is the best one I have ever been to.  I am looking for a nice mid-tier steak place for when I want something better than Outback, but don't want to dress up for Del Frisco's.  If anyone has any suggestions.  Edit:  I forgot **Crown and Anchor** for pub food.  All you can eat fish and chips on Monday.  Also, **Rosemary's** [(link)](http://www.rosemarysrestaurant.com) for dressy dinner.  Locally owned and operated.
Apartments in the sky, don't wanna serve no fries. The rent is too damn high!
Me too. More than a mouthful is just a waste.
damn u look tall. nothing like a tall blonde 
Because the search will find it as you type, also ie is so terrible that you are better off just looking for the word yourself.  
Tell me Ed, why do you hate punctuation and capitalization?
How many people need to update their graphics cards every 2-3 hours?
I disagree that Trade Posts are the same thing as Cottages. Cottages were an investment. They grew over time and would eventually develop into Towns (+4 commerce). Trading Posts are a flat +1. That disappoints me, because mid-to-late game, I found it very satisfying to have fully developed Towns around my cities. Plus, when things were quiet, I could switch over to Democracy and get production from them.  What part of religion didn't make sense? You founded it, it spread, you got culture. It had temples that gave you happiness, and monasteries that helped you spread it. You could choose how your civilization handled religion (Organized Religion, Theocracy, etc).  I also never found stacks-of-doom particularly clumsy. You say it's like a zerg rush, but really, isn't that just the same as getting eight units moving as a carpet-of-doom? At some point in the game, you've simply built more units than your opponent, and are going to steamroll them regardless.
I did the heat gun trick for a second time but spent more time on the heating part.  Seems to be holding up for now...
That is a possible explanation, but not the only.
Not even moved? Damn. I would of liked to have seen us play Egypt even in another country.
and some drunk couldn't have heard that and found an opportunity to use it himself?
sad!  glad i've been able to walk through it on the way to Rockies games a lot since i moved out here 2 years ago, though.
Unless you're super skinny or a starship captain or both.
Well, that sounds like it works for you.
Everyone gets a mansion
OH FUCK YES!
Has a photo ever made you feel sick?
Coletta's started serving pizza in Memphis in the 1950's and is said to be the inventor of the BBQ pizza. 
Just deconstruct the hot dog and put it on a rectangular plate. At a 35 degree angle.
The fact that when the zombies "die" (forgive me, I'm not very well versed in the ways of zombies) and there are no "living" ones left, the remaining humans (if there are any), get to start over.
I'm not sure I understand what you mean by "stand alone". If you're talking about preposition stranding as in "where are you *from*?", then you're right, they cannot be stranded in German (although they can in some Scandinavian languages, in addition to English).  Basque, though, is very, very different from German. For one, it's a language isolate, meaning it's not related to any other languages that we know of. Secondly, Basque has an ergative/absolutive case system, whereas German (and most other languages) has a nominative/accusative system. Ergative/absolutive systems distinguish **subjects of transitive verbs** from **subjects of intransitive verbs or objects of transitive verbs**, respectively. Nominative/accusative on the other hand distinguishes subjects from (direct) objects.  Now, in addition to a fundamental difference in the lexical case systems these languages employ, they also have different sets of semantic cases, and this, I think, is what you mean when you talk about cases that serve the same purpose as prepositions in English. Basque has 9 semantic cases which are similar to prepositions semantically, but not syntactically. German has two (dative and genitive), and then as I mentioned above, a whole raft of prepositions. It should be noted that Basque also has dative and genitive (actually it has two genitives), but that is the beginning and end to the similarities between the case systems of Basque and German.  I'm sorry to say, but I don't think you could have picked two more different languages to compare. By the way, where did you learn Basque? It's a fascinating language.
Why am I not eating this right now?   why...
Good luck man, I've been getting turned down for even lowly gatsby w/ hearts offering a purple energy demo crown, and turned down for a tyrolean w/ hearts offering a scorching noble. Medic w/ hearts is insanely highly priced. 
Looks like he's not trying to appeal to your demographic.
Weekend life? You mean just life in general, right?
This isn't true. From Netflix: "The ISPs' costs, however, to deliver a marginal gigabyte, which is about an hour of viewing, from one of our regional interchange points over their last mile wired network to the consumer is less than a penny, and falling..."   There is a large, fixed, up front cost for building and maintaining a network, but the cost of transmitting data is negligible. Losing any user hurts profits, and with UBB losing power users would hurt even more.
Was it? A show like House is an exception, for being exceptional. The real tv comment should have let you in on the joke though. They went full steam ahead with that shit because it's cheap and lazy and as popularity for a show increases no doubt so do commercials. The age old argument for the commercials is that it brings you production quality and good shows but where are they?
In fairness, nibblerslitterbox **first** said that Jesus fulfilled the OT law. Thus no prohibitions against dude-on-dude (if you're an antinomianist). If anything, Paul was reasserting his tastes over the New Covenant.  Ironically, it seems that your comment, "Paul was so much smarter than Yahweh", cuts more against the camp that opposes homosexuality.
&gt; ...has made the Tea Party and hundreds of right-wing abuses of our democratic system possible. How exactly is the Tea Party abusing our democratic system? When you say "system", aren't you referring to the US Constitution? If you disagree with the Constitution, just say so. Come out of the closet and admit you're a communist, a marxist, or a socialist. Leftist ideology may be idiotic, but it's legal, FFS.
Flash!
i feel it helps pass the time, but it depends on your severity of your sickness
That actually is more true of men than women in my experience.  Most women as I have noticed are rather supportive of each other (Unless they don't like each other personally.)  Men tend to judge women and each other far more.  I say this, as a man who has done that in the past myself.
&gt;like telemarketers calling your cell phone and using your minutes when you only have so many per month.  Or even, junk mail coming to your home, and you're supposed to pay the postage.   Imagine when it's some ad you can't skip or block that puts you over the limit.  Consumer outcry, and subsequent widespread ad blocking *should* get advertisers on the bandwagon to stop metered usage.  The added value with cable was, that you didn't have to watch commercials. Then, no commercials only on premium channels. Finally, fast forward through any commercials using Tivo. Technology has a way of finding a way around the absurd, and this is fairly absurd.  Advertisers should be fighting metered usage tooth and nail.
Try on a regular one. If it is causing you pain/real discomfort you should try another brand or a magnum.
Really, its a shame... Another example would be the watch company Zodiac, who made some decent timepieces in the 1960s. It was them purchased by fossil, and it just a shadow of it's former self today.
Quit it with that false equivalency bullshit. It is not the same on both sides, and no one is buying what you're selling. 
And they also hide erections!
lol, I'm not hurt. Under my Dell Complete Care they'll cover anything, even anything that's my fault. Failing to cover outside of warranty isn't limited to any one seller, all of them act this way.
WELCOME! 
Where can I buy my copy?
